Indiana, session 2026, HB1055.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 3-5-1-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
2 A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
3 PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) Whenever a statute in this title, IC 6, IC 20,
4 or IC 36 refers to a municipal primary election, the reference is to
5 the primary election in a municipality at which candidates are
6 nominated for election to municipal offices, as applicable to the
7 municipality under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6.
8 (b) Whenever a statute in this title, IC 6, IC 20, or IC 36 refers
9 to a municipal election or a municipal general election, the
10 reference is to the general election in a municipality at which
11 candidates are elected to municipal offices, as applicable to the
12 municipality under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6.
13 SECTION 2. IC 3-5-2.1-68.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
14 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
15 [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 68.5. "Nonpresidential
16 election year" refers to an even-numbered year that is not a
17 presidential election year.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

2
1 SECTION 3. IC 3-5-2.1-82.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
2 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
3 [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 82.8. "Presidential election
4 year" refers to a year in which an election for electors for
5 President of the United States is held.
6 SECTION 4. IC 3-5-3-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2017,
7 SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
8 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
9 During the period that begins ninety (90) days before a municipal
10 primary election and continues until the day after the following
11 municipal election, all expenses of the primary election and election
12 that cannot be chargeable directly to any municipality shall be
13 apportioned as follows:
14 (1) Twenty-five percent (25%) to the county.
15 (2) Seventy-five percent (75%) to the municipalities in the county
16 holding the municipal primary election and municipal election.
17 (b) The apportionment made under subsection (a) does not apply to
18 a town that has entered into an agreement with the county under
19 IC 3-10-7-4 to pay the county a fixed amount for the expenses
20 described in subsection (a).
21 (c) (b) This subsection applies to a county that is designated as a
22 vote center county under IC 3-11-18.1. During the period that begins
23 ninety (90) days before a municipal primary election and continues
24 until the day after the following municipal election, all expenses
25 incurred by the county in conducting the municipal primary election
26 and municipal election shall be apportioned among the municipalities
27 in the county holding a municipal primary and municipal election.
28 SECTION 5. IC 3-5-3-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2017,
29 SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
30 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c)
31 and (d), subsection (c), whenever more than one (1) municipality in a
32 county conducts a municipal primary election, the seventy-five percent
33 (75%) of expenses that cannot be chargeable directly to any particular
34 municipality under section 8 of this chapter shall be apportioned to
35 each municipality in the same ratio that the number of voters who cast
36 a ballot in the municipality at the municipal primary election bears to
37 the total number of voters who cast a ballot in all of the municipalities
38 in the county at that municipal primary election.
39 (b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), subsection (c),
40 whenever more than one (1) municipality in a county conducts a
41 municipal election, the seventy-five percent (75%) of expenses that are
42 not chargeable directly to any particular municipality under section 8
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

3
1 of this chapter must be apportioned to each municipality in the same
2 ratio that the number of voters who cast a ballot in the municipality at
3 the municipal election bears to the total number of voters who cast a
4 ballot in all of the municipalities in the county that conducted a
5 municipal election.
6 (c) The apportionment made under subsection (a) does not apply to
7 a town that has entered into an agreement with the county under
8 IC 3-10-7-4 to pay the county a fixed amount for the expenses
9 described in subsection (a).
10 (d) (c) This subsection
11 (1) applies to a county designated as a vote center county under
12 IC 3-11-18.1. and
13 (2) does not apply to a town that has entered into an agreement
14 with the county under IC 3-10-7-4 to pay the county a fixed
15 amount for its municipal primary election and municipal election
16 expenses.
17 All expenses incurred by the county in conducting the municipal
18 primary election and municipal election shall be apportioned to each
19 municipality in the same ratio that the number of voters who cast a
20 ballot in the municipality at the municipal primary election or the
21 municipal election bears to the total number of voters who cast a ballot
22 in all of the municipalities in the county at that municipal primary
23 election or municipal election.
24 SECTION 6. IC 3-6-5-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.258-2013,
25 SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
26 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 14. (a) Each county election board, in addition
27 to duties otherwise prescribed by law, shall do the following:
28 (1) Conduct all elections and administer the election laws within
29 the county, except as provided in IC 3-8-5 and IC 3-10-7 for town
30 conventions and municipal elections in certain small towns.
31 (2) Prepare all ballots.
32 (3) Distribute all ballots to all of the precincts in the county.
33 (b) Not later than the Monday before distributing ballots and voting
34 systems to the precincts in the county, the county election board shall
35 notify the county chairman of each major political party and, upon
36 request, the chairman of any other bona fide political party in the
37 county, that sample ballots are available for inspection.
38 SECTION 7. IC 3-6-5-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2017,
39 SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
40 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
41 this section applies when an election is conducted in a political
42 subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13 and other than a county) that
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

4
1 contains territory in more than one (1) county.
2 (b) This section does not apply to an election
3 (1) conducted at the same time as a primary or general election
4 during an even-numbered year. or
5 (2) conducted in a town by a town election board under IC 3-10-7.
6 (c) To the extent authorized by this section, the county election
7 board of the county that contains the greatest percentage of population
8 of the political subdivision shall conduct all elections for the political
9 subdivision. The county election board may designate polling places
10 for the election, which may be located in any county in which the
11 political subdivision is located, and shall appoint precinct election
12 officers to conduct the election upon nomination by the county
13 chairman of the county where the precinct is located, or by filling a
14 vacancy if a nomination is not timely made. However, each county
15 election board shall provide poll lists for voters, receive and approve
16 absentee ballot applications, issue certificates of error or other
17 documents for the voters of that county, print ballots for the municipal
18 or special election, and conduct activity required to canvass the votes
19 under IC 3-12-5-2(b).
20 SECTION 8. IC 3-6-6-27 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
21 PASSAGE]. Sec. 27. The county executive shall fix the compensation
22 paid under sections 25 and 26 of this chapter for all elections except
23 municipal elections held by towns under IC 3-10-7. The fiscal body of
24 a town holding a municipal election under IC 3-10-7 shall fix the
25 compensation paid under sections 25 and 26 of this chapter.
26 SECTION 9. IC 3-8-5-14.3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
27 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 14.3. If a
28 convention or a primary election is not required under section 10 of this
29 chapter: notwithstanding IC 3-10-7:
30 (1) a municipal primary election or town convention may not be
31 held; and
32 (2) each candidate who filed a declaration of candidacy shall be
33 placed on the municipal election ballot. unless IC 3-10-7-6(b)
34 applies.
35 SECTION 10. IC 3-8-5-14.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.278-2019,
36 SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
37 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 14.5. (a) A town election board or circuit
38 court clerk conducting a municipal election under IC 3-10-7
39 IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 may not include the name of a candidate
40 nominated by a town convention on the municipal election ballot if the
41 person files a notice to withdraw with the clerk. The circuit court clerk
42 shall notify the town election board of any candidate withdrawal filed
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

5
1 under this subsection not later than the deadline for the clerk to file a
2 copy of the certification of nomination under section 13(e) of this
3 chapter.
4 (b) The notice to withdraw must:
5 (1) be signed and acknowledged before an officer authorized to
6 take acknowledgments of deeds;
7 (2) have the certificate of acknowledgment appended to the
8 notice; and
9 (3) be filed with the clerk no later than noon three (3) days
10 following the adjournment of the convention.
11 SECTION 11. IC 3-8-6-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.194-2013,
12 SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
13 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11. (a) Whenever a town is wholly or partly
14 located in a county having a consolidated city, a petition of nomination
15 must be filed with the circuit court clerk of the county having the
16 consolidated city.
17 (b) Whenever a town not described in subsection (a) has entered
18 into an agreement with a county under IC 3-10-7-4, the petition must
19 be filed with the county voter registration office of that county.
20 (c) (b) When a petition is filed under subsection (a) or (b) for
21 nomination to an office whose election district is in more than one (1)
22 county, the circuit court clerk or board of registration shall examine the
23 voter registration records of each county in the election district to
24 determine if each petitioner is eligible to vote for the candidates being
25 nominated by the petition.
26 SECTION 12. IC 3-10-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
27 AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
28 UPON PASSAGE]:
29 Chapter 5.5. Elections for Municipal Offices
30 Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this chapter
31 applies to an election for a municipal office after June 30, 2026, for
32 a:
33 (1) town that has a population of not more than ten thousand
34 (10,000);
35 (2) town that has a population of more than ten thousand
36 (10,000) that has not adopted a resolution under section 2 of
37 this chapter; and
38 (3) city that has adopted a resolution under section 2 of this
39 chapter.
40 (b) This chapter does not apply to the town of Vernon
41 (incorporated under Local Acts 1851, c.1, as amended).
42 Sec. 2. (a) The legislative body (as defined in IC 36-1-2-9) of a
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

6
1 town that has a population of more than ten thousand (10,000) may
2 adopt a resolution, by majority vote, not later than December 1,
3 2026, providing that the municipality elects to hold municipal
4 elections on odd-numbered years under IC 3-10-6.
5 (b) The legislative body (as defined in IC 36-1-2-9) of a city may
6 adopt a resolution, by majority vote, not later than December 1,
7 2026, providing that the municipality elects to hold municipal
8 elections during the general election in each presidential year.
9 (c) Except as provided in section 6(a), 6(b), and 6(c) of this
10 chapter, if a legislative body:
11 (1) of a town that has a population of more than ten thousand
12 (10,000) does not adopt a resolution under subsection (a); or
13 (2) of a city does adopt a resolution under subsection (b);
14 this chapter applies to the municipality.
15 (d) A copy of a resolution adopted under subsection (a) or (b)
16 shall be filed with the secretary of state.
17 Sec. 3. (a) An individual elected to a municipal office at the 2023
18 municipal election is entitled to hold over after the expiration of the
19 individual's term until a successor has been elected and qualified
20 under subsection (b).
21 (b) The successor of an individual elected to a municipal office
22 at the 2023 municipal election shall:
23 (1) be elected at the 2028 general election; and
24 (2) take office at noon on January 1, 2029.
25 (c) The successors of an individual elected to a municipal office
26 under subsection (b) shall:
27 (1) be elected at the general election held in each presidential
28 election year;
29 (2) take office the following January 1 at noon; and
30 (3) serve a term of four (4) years.
31 Sec. 4. (a) An individual elected as a judge of a city or town
32 court at the 2023 municipal election is entitled to hold over after
33 the expiration of the individual's term until a successor has been
34 elected and qualified under subsection (b).
35 (b) The successor of an individual elected as a judge of a city or
36 town court at the 2023 municipal election shall:
37 (1) be elected at the 2028 general election; and
38 (2) take office at noon on January 1, 2029.
39 (c) The successors of an individual elected as a judge of a city or
40 town court under subsection (b) shall:
41 (1) be elected at the general election held in each presidential
42 election year;
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

7
1 (2) take office the following January 1 at noon; and
2 (3) serve a term of four (4) years.
3 Sec. 5. Except as provided in section 6 of this chapter, the
4 successors of an individual elected to a municipal office at the 2022
5 general election shall:
6 (1) be elected at the general election held in each
7 nonpresidential election year;
8 (2) take office the following January 1 at noon; and
9 (3) serve a term of four (4) years.
10 Sec. 6. (a) This subsection applies to an individual elected to a
11 municipal office at the 2022 general election in a:
12 (1) town that has a population of more than ten thousand
13 (10,000) that has adopted a resolution under section 2(a) of
14 this chapter; or
15 (2) city that has not adopted a resolution under section 2(b) of
16 this chapter.
17 An individual described in this subsection is entitled to hold over
18 after the expiration of the individual's term until a successor has
19 been elected. The successor of an individual described in this
20 subsection shall be elected under IC 3-10-6 at the 2027 municipal
21 election.
22 (b) This subsection applies to an individual elected to a
23 municipal office at the 2023 municipal election in a:
24 (1) town that has a population of more than ten thousand
25 (10,000) that has adopted a resolution under section 2(a) of
26 this chapter; or
27 (2) city that has not adopted a resolution under section 2(b) of
28 this chapter.
29 The successor of an individual described in this subsection shall be
30 elected under IC 3-10-6 at the 2027 municipal election.
31 (c) Except as otherwise provided by law, the successors of an
32 individual elected under subsection (a) or (b) shall:
33 (1) be elected at the municipal election held in each
34 odd-numbered year before a presidential election year under
35 IC 3-10-6;
36 (2) take office the following January 1; and
37 (3) serve a term of four (4) years.
38 Sec. 7. The successors of an individual elected to a municipal
39 office at the 2024 general election shall:
40 (1) be elected at the general election held in each presidential
41 election year;
42 (2) take office the following January 1; and
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

8
1 (3) serve a term of four (4) years.
2 Sec. 8. (a) This section applies to each political party whose
3 nominee received at least ten percent (10%) of the votes cast for
4 secretary of state at the most recent election for secretary of state.
5 (b) The political party shall nominate all candidates for election
6 to municipal offices at a primary election as provided in this
7 article.
8 Sec. 9. (a) This section applies to a candidate of a political party:
9 (1) not qualified to conduct a primary election under this
10 article; and
11 (2) not required to nominate candidates by a petition of
12 nomination under IC 3-8-6.
13 (b) Notwithstanding IC 3-10-6-1, a candidate for election to a
14 municipal office must be nominated at a convention in the manner
15 described in IC 3-10-6-12.
16 Sec. 10. The general election for municipal offices shall be held
17 on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the
18 following:
19 (1) A presidential election year, for municipal offices whose
20 terms expire at the end of the presidential election year.
21 (2) A nonpresidential election year, for municipal offices
22 whose terms expire at the end of the nonpresidential election
23 year.
24 Sec. 11. (a) In accordance with IC 3-11-1.5 and to the extent
25 applicable and feasible, the circuit court clerk, the county fiscal
26 body, the county executive, and the county election board of each
27 county in which there are voters who are entitled to vote for offices
28 in a municipality, but who live in a county adjacent to the county
29 in which the greatest percentage of the population of the
30 municipality resides, shall:
31 (1) upon written request of their counterpart election officers
32 in the county with the greatest percentage of the population
33 of the municipality, establish precincts in the municipality;
34 and
35 (2) supply the precincts established with poll lists and perform
36 all other duties under this title as if the voters were
37 inhabitants of a municipality with the greatest percentage of
38 its population within that county.
39 (b) The commission shall, if necessary, implement this section by
40 orders and rules. Local governments may use IC 36-1-7 for
41 contractual agreements concerning the costs of services, supplies,
42 and equipment required.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

9
1 SECTION 13. IC 3-10-6-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
2 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter
3 applies to municipal and school district elections in the following
4 municipalities:
5 (1) all cities and towns having a population of more than ten
6 thousand (10,000) to which IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply.
7 (2) Towns having a population of three thousand five hundred
8 (3,500) or more.
9 (3) Towns located entirely or partially within a county having a
10 consolidated city, regardless of their population.
11 (b) Prison inmates may not be counted in determining population
12 size for purposes of this chapter.
13 SECTION 14. IC 3-10-6.5-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.107-2020,
14 SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
15 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), This
16 chapter applies expires upon HEA 1055-2026 becoming effective.
17 only to the following municipalities.
18 (1) A town.
19 (2) A city with a population of less than three thousand five
20 hundred (3,500).
21 (b) This chapter does not apply to a municipality located wholly or
22 partially in a county having a consolidated city.
23 SECTION 15. IC 3-10-6.5-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
24 PASSAGE]. Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "municipal election year"
25 refers to an odd-numbered year determined under IC 3-10-6-5.
26 SECTION 16. IC 3-10-6.5-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
27 PASSAGE]. Sec. 3. During a year immediately before a municipal
28 election year, the legislative body of a municipality may adopt an
29 ordinance providing that each elected office of the municipality is
30 elected in an even-numbered year.
31 SECTION 17. IC 3-10-6.5-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
32 PASSAGE]. Sec. 4. An ordinance described in section 3 of this chapter
33 must provide the following:
34 (1) The term of office for each individual elected to an office of
35 the municipality at the next municipal election year. A term of
36 office set under this subdivision must be either:
37 (A) one (1) year; or
38 (B) three (3) years;
39 as specified in the ordinance for each elected office of the
40 municipality.
41 (2) That the successors of the individuals elected during the next
42 municipal election year shall be elected in the following
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

10
1 applicable even-numbered year as determined by the term of
2 office set for each office in the ordinance under subdivision (1).
3 (3) That the term of office of the successors of the individuals
4 elected for the initial term of office set for each office under
5 subdivision (1) is four (4) years, beginning January 1 after their
6 respective elections.
7 SECTION 18. IC 3-10-6.5-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
8 PASSAGE]. Sec. 5. If a municipality adopts an ordinance under section
9 3 of this chapter, the elected officers of the municipality shall be
10 elected under IC 3-10-6 or IC 3-10-7:
11 (1) whichever is applicable to the municipality; and
12 (2) to the extent either of those statutes is not inconsistent with
13 this chapter.
14 SECTION 19. IC 3-10-6.5-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
15 PASSAGE]. Sec. 6. An ordinance adopted under this chapter:
16 (1) may not be repealed earlier than twelve (12) years after the
17 ordinance was adopted under section 3 of this chapter; and
18 (2) may be repealed only in a year preceding a municipal election
19 year.
20 SECTION 20. IC 3-10-6.5-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
21 PASSAGE]. Sec. 7. An ordinance adopted under section 3 or 6 of this
22 chapter takes effect when the ordinance is filed with the circuit court
23 clerk of the county in which the largest percentage of the population of
24 the municipality is located.
25 SECTION 21. IC 3-10-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
26 PASSAGE]. (Municipal Elections in Small Towns Located Outside
27 Marion County).
28 SECTION 22. IC 3-10-12-3.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2017,
29 SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
30 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3.4. (a) This section applies to a voter who:
31 (1) changes residence from a precinct in a county to another
32 precinct:
33 (A) in the same county; and
34 (B) in the same congressional district;
35 as the former precinct; and
36 (2) does not notify the county voter registration office of the
37 change of address before election day.
38 (b) A voter described by subsection (a) may:
39 (1) correct the voter registration record; and
40 (2) vote in the precinct where the voter formerly resided;
41 if the voter makes an oral affirmation as described in subsection (e) or
42 uses the affidavit prescribed by the election division under
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

11
1 IC 3-10-11-6 to make a written affirmation of the voter's current
2 residence address as described in section 4 of this chapter. of the
3 voter's current residence address.
4 (c) A voter who moved outside of a municipality may not return to
5 the precinct where the voter formerly resided to vote in a municipal an
6 election for municipal offices of that municipality.
7 (d) A voter who moved from a location outside a municipality to a
8 location within a municipality before a:
9 (1) municipal primary election for municipal offices;
10 (2) municipal general election for municipal offices; or
11 (3) special election held only within the municipality;
12 may not vote in the municipal primary election municipal for
13 municipal offices, general election for municipal offices, or special
14 election held only within the municipality in the precinct of the person's
15 former residence.
16 (e) A voter entitled to make a written affirmation under subsection
17 (b) may make an oral affirmation. The voter must make the oral
18 affirmation before the poll clerks of the precinct. After the voter makes
19 an oral affirmation under this subsection, the poll clerks shall:
20 (1) reduce the substance of the affirmation to writing at an
21 appropriate location on the poll list; and
22 (2) initial the affirmation.
23 SECTION 23. IC 3-11-1.5-25 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
24 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 25. (a) In a year
25 in which a general election is held, a precinct establishment order
26 may not become effective during the following periods:
27 (1) In a year in which a general election is held, the period
28 beginning on the first day that a declaration of candidacy may be
29 filed under IC 3-8-2-4 and ending the day following general
30 election day.
31 (2) (b) This subsection applies to a municipal election that is
32 held in a municipality to which IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply. For
33 precincts located wholly or partially within a municipality, a precinct
34 establishment order may not become effective after January 31 and
35 before the day following municipal election day, in a year in which a
36 municipal election is held.
37 SECTION 24. IC 3-11-1.5-33 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
38 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 33. (a) If the
39 boundaries of a municipality are extended before a municipal primary
40 election or a municipal an election:
41 (1) to nominate candidates for municipal offices; or
42 (2) to elect candidates for municipal offices;
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

12
1 and the territory within those boundaries has not been included in
2 precincts wholly within the municipality, the voters within the extended
3 boundaries may vote, if otherwise qualified, in the municipal primary
4 election or municipal the general election.
5 (b) The voters may vote in the precinct in which they have their
6 residence as if the precinct had been established to include them in a
7 precinct wholly within the municipality. These votes shall be counted
8 and included in the canvass of the votes cast in the municipal primary
9 election or municipal the general election.
10 SECTION 25. IC 3-11-1.5-35, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2005,
11 SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
12 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 35. (a) This section applies to a county that
13 has a precinct that crosses a boundary in violation of section 4(4), 4(5),
14 or 4(6) of this chapter.
15 (b) Notwithstanding section 25 of this chapter, if the county does
16 not issue a precinct establishment order that establishes precincts in
17 compliance with section 4(4), 4(5), and 4(6) of this chapter by the
18 January 31 following the last effective date described in section 25(2)
19 25(b) of this chapter, the commission may issue an order establishing
20 precincts as provided under subsection (c).
21 (c) An order issued by the commission under this section must
22 comply with section 4(4), 4(5), and 4(6) of this chapter.
23 (d) The co-directors shall send a copy of the commission's order to
24 the office.
25 SECTION 26. IC 3-11-10-26.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2021,
26 SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
27 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 26.5. (a) This section applies to:
28 (1) a municipal election conducted in a municipality to which
29 IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply;
30 (2) a primary conducted in a municipal election year in a
31 municipality to which IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply; and
32 (3) a special election conducted under IC 3-10-8 and that is not
33 conducted at the same time as any other election.
34 (b) Notwithstanding section 26 of this chapter or IC 3-11-18.1-4 in
35 a vote center county, a county election board (or a town election board
36 acting under IC 3-10-7) may adopt a resolution or an amendment to a
37 county vote center plan by the unanimous vote of the board's entire
38 membership stating that voters are entitled to vote by absentee ballot
39 before an absentee voter board in the office of the circuit court clerk or
40 town election board during specific days and hours identified in the
41 resolution.
42 (c) If the election board adopts a resolution or an amendment under
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

13
1 subsection (b), the board must include written findings of fact in the
2 resolution or amendment stating:
3 (1) the number of absentee ballot applications anticipated or
4 previously received for the election;
5 (2) the expense to be incurred by providing absentee ballot voting
6 in the office during the entire period required under section 26 of
7 this chapter; and
8 (3) that voters would experience little or no inconvenience by
9 restricting absentee ballot voting in the office to the days and
10 hours specified in the resolution or amendment.
11 SECTION 27. IC 3-11-18.1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2023,
12 SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
13 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b),
14 and (c), a plan must provide a vote center for use by voters residing
15 within the county for use in a primary election, general election, special
16 election, municipal primary, or municipal election conducted on or
17 after the effective date of the county election board's order.
18 (b) A plan may provide that a vote center will not be used in a
19 municipal election conducted in 2023, 2027, 2031, 2035, 2039, 2043,
20 and every four (4) years thereafter for some or all of the towns:
21 (1) located within the county; and
22 (2) having a population of less than three thousand five hundred
23 (3,500).
24 (c) This section does not apply in a town that has established a town
25 election board under IC 3-10-7-5.7 while the resolution established
26 under IC 3-10-7-5.7 is in effect.
27 SECTION 28. IC 3-12-5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
28 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) Whenever a
29 candidate is elected:
30 (1) to a local or school board office other than
31 (A) one for which a town clerk-treasurer issues a certificate of
32 election under IC 3-10-7-34; or
33 (B) one commissioned by the governor under IC 4-3-1-5; or
34 (2) a precinct committeeman or state convention delegate;
35 the circuit court clerk shall, when permitted under section 16 of this
36 chapter, prepare and deliver to the candidate on demand a certificate
37 of the candidate's election.
38 (b) This subsection applies to a local or school board office
39 described in subsection (a) with an election district located in more
40 than one (1) county and a local public question placed on the ballot in
41 more than one (1) county. The circuit court clerk of the county that
42 contains the greatest percentage of the population of the election
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

14
1 district shall, upon demand of the candidate or a person entitled to
2 request a recount of the votes cast on a public question under
3 IC 3-12-12:
4 (1) obtain the certified statement of the votes cast for that office
5 or on that question that was prepared under IC 3-12-4-9 from the
6 circuit court clerk in each other county in which the election
7 district is located;
8 (2) tabulate the total votes cast for that office or on that question
9 as shown on the certified statement of each county in the election
10 district; and
11 (3) issue a certificate of election to the candidate when permitted
12 under section 16 of this chapter or a certificate declaring the local
13 public question approved or rejected.
14 SECTION 29. IC 3-12-6-31 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
15 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 31. (a) The circuit
16 court clerk shall transmit the certificate prepared under section 30 of
17 this chapter to the election division, the county election board or other
18 public official authorized by this title to issue:
19 (1) a certificate of nomination under IC 3-8-7;
20 (2) a certificate of election under IC 3-10-7-34 or IC 3-12-5-2; or
21 (3) a commission for the office under IC 4-3-1-5.
22 (b) The election division shall provide a copy of a certificate
23 transmitted to the election division under this section to the office.
24 SECTION 30. IC 3-12-11-25, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
25 SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
26 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 25. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
27 whenever the commission makes a final determination under section
28 18 of this chapter that the candidate who is subject to a contest
29 proceeding is not eligible to serve in the office to which the candidate
30 is nominated or elected, the candidate who received the second highest
31 number of votes for the office is entitled to a certificate of nomination
32 or certificate of election even though a certificate may have been issued
33 to another candidate upon the tabulation of the votes.
34 (b) This subsection applies to a contest proceeding for a state office
35 other than the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, justice of the
36 supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, and judge of the tax court.
37 Whenever the commission makes a final determination under section
38 18(b) of this chapter that the candidate who is subject to a contest
39 proceeding is not eligible to serve in the office to which the candidate
40 is elected the following apply:
41 (1) This subdivision does not apply to the filling of a state office
42 following a contest proceeding or court action that resulted from
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

15
1 an election held before January 1, 2011. The office is considered
2 vacant, and the governor shall fill the vacancy as provided in
3 IC 3-13-4-3(e) by the appointment of a person of the same
4 political party as the candidate who is not eligible to serve.
5 (2) The commission's determination that the candidate is not
6 eligible to serve in the office does not affect the votes cast for the
7 candidate for purposes of determining the number or percentage
8 of votes cast for purposes of other statutes, including
9 IC 3-5-2.1-62, IC 3-6-2-1, IC 3-6-4.1-6, IC 3-6-5.2-7, IC 3-6-6-8,
10 IC 3-6-7-1, IC 3-6-8-1, IC 3-8-4, IC 3-8-6, IC 3-10-1-2,
11 IC 3-10-2-15, IC 3-10-4-2, IC 3-10-6, IC 3-10-7-26, IC 3-11-2-6,
12 IC 3-11-13-11, IC 3-11-14-3.5, IC 3-13-9-4.5, IC 6-9-2-3, and
13 IC 36-4-1.5-2.
14 SECTION 31. IC 3-13-8-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.119-2005,
15 SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
16 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) This section applies to a vacancy in the
17 city-county council of a first class city not covered by section 1 of this
18 chapter.
19 (b) A vacancy shall be filled by a majority of the remaining
20 members of the council at a regular or special meeting. The city clerk
21 shall give notice of the meeting. Except as provided in subsection (c),
22 the meeting shall be held not later than thirty (30) days after the
23 vacancy occurs. The notice must:
24 (1) be in writing;
25 (2) state the purpose of the meeting;
26 (3) state the date, time, and place of the meeting; and
27 (4) be sent by first class mail to each council member at least ten
28 (10) days before the meeting.
29 (c) If a vacancy exists because of the death of a council member, the
30 council shall meet and select an individual to fill the vacancy not later
31 than thirty (30) days after the city clerk receives notice of the death
32 under IC 5-8-6. The city clerk may not give the notice required by
33 subsection (b) until the city clerk receives notice of the death under
34 IC 5-8-6.
35 (d) The appointed member serves until a successor is elected and
36 qualified at the next municipal or general election whichever occurs
37 first. for members of the city-county council. The successor serves
38 from noon January 1 following that election to noon January 1
39 following the next municipal election for members of the city-county
40 council, as provided in IC 36-3-4-2. The persons appointed and elected
41 must be resident voters in the district where the vacancy occurred,
42 unless the vacancy occurred in an at large seat.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

16
1 SECTION 32. IC 5-4-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.55-2022,
2 SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
3 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) The oath required by section 1 of this
4 chapter, except in the case of a notary public or in those cases specified
5 in section 3 of this chapter, shall be endorsed on or attached to the:
6 (1) commission;
7 (2) certificate if a certificate was issued under IC 3-10-7-34,
8 IC 3-12-4 or IC 3-12-5; or
9 (3) certificate of appointment pro tempore under IC 3-13-11-11;
10 signed by the person taking the oath, and certified to by the officer
11 before whom the oath was taken, who shall also deliver to the person
12 taking the oath a copy of the oath.
13 (b) A copy of the oath of office of a prosecuting attorney shall be
14 attached to the commission of the prosecuting attorney.
15 SECTION 33. IC 33-35-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2023,
16 SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
17 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) During 2026, 2030, 2034, 2038, 2042,
18 and every fourth year after that, a second or third class city or a town
19 may by ordinance establish or abolish a city or town court. An
20 ordinance to establish a city or town court must be adopted not less
21 than one (1) year before the judge's term would begin under
22 IC 3-10-5.5-4 or section 3 of this chapter.
23 (b) The judge for a court established under subsection (a) shall be
24 elected under one (1) of the following, as applicable to the
25 municipality:
26 (1) IC 3-10-6, or IC 3-10-7, at the municipal election in
27 November 2023, 2027, 2031, 2035, 2039, 2043, and every four
28 (4) years thereafter.
29 (2) IC 3-10-5.5.
30 (c) A court established under subsection (a) comes into existence on
31 January 1 of the year following the year in which a judge is elected to
32 serve in that court.
33 (d) A city or town court in existence on January 1, 1986, may
34 continue in operation until it is abolished by ordinance.
35 (e) A city or town that establishes or abolishes a court under this
36 section shall give notice of its action to the following:
37 (1) The office of judicial administration under IC 33-24-6.
38 (2) The secretary of state.
39 (3) The circuit court clerk of the county in which the greatest
40 population of the city or town resides.
41 SECTION 34. IC 33-35-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2015,
42 SECTION 48, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

17
1 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) The judge of a city or town court shall
2 be elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 or IC 3-10-7 by the voters
3 of the city or town.
4 (b) Except as provided in subsections subsection (c), (d), and (e),
5 the term of office of a judge elected under this section is four (4) years,
6 beginning at noon January 1 after election and continuing until a
7 successor is elected and qualified.
8 (c) This subsection applies to a town that adopts an ordinance under
9 IC 3-10-6-2.6. The term of office of:
10 (1) a judge elected at the next municipal election not conducted
11 in a general election year is one (1) year; and
12 (2) the successors to the judge described in subdivision (1) is four
13 (4) years;
14 beginning at noon January 1 after election and continuing until a
15 successor is elected and qualified.
16 (d) This subsection applies to a town that adopts an ordinance under
17 IC 3-10-7-2.7. The term of office of:
18 (1) a judge elected at the next municipal election not conducted
19 in a general election year is three (3) years; and
20 (2) the successors to the judge described in subdivision (1) is four
21 (4) years;
22 beginning noon January 1 after election and continuing until a
23 successor is elected and qualified.
24 (e) This subsection applies to a town that adopts an ordinance under
25 IC 3-10-7-2.9. The term of office of:
26 (1) a judge elected in the first election cycle after adoption of the
27 ordinance is the term of office provided by the ordinance, not to
28 exceed four (4) years; and
29 (2) the successors of the judge described in subdivision (1) is four
30 (4) years.
31 (f) (d) Before beginning the duties of office, the judge shall, in the
32 manner prescribed by IC 5-4-1, execute a bond conditioned upon the
33 faithful discharge of the duties of office.
34 SECTION 35. IC 33-35-3-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
35 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) The officers
36 of a city court are a:
37 (1) judge;
38 (2) clerk; and
39 (3) bailiff.
40 However, in third class cities, the judge may act as clerk and perform
41 all duties of the clerk of the court or appoint a clerk of the court. If the
42 judge does not act as clerk of the court or appoint a clerk of the court,
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

18
1 the city clerk-treasurer elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 shall
2 perform the duties of the clerk of the city court.
3 (b) The clerk is an officer of a town court. The judge of a town court
4 may act as clerk and perform all duties of the clerk of the court or
5 appoint a clerk of the court. If the judge does not act as a clerk of the
6 court or appoint a clerk of the court, the town clerk-treasurer elected
7 under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 or IC 3-10-7 shall perform the duties
8 of the clerk of the town court.
9 (c) The clerk and bailiff may not receive any fees or compensation
10 other than their salaries.
11 SECTION 36. IC 36-1-2-11.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
12 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
13 [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.5. "Nonpresidential
14 election year" has the meaning set forth in IC 3-5-2.1-68.5.
15 SECTION 37. IC 36-1-2-13.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
16 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
17 [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 13.5. "Presidential election
18 year" has the meaning set forth in IC 3-5-2.1-82.8.
19 SECTION 38. IC 36-1.5-4-35, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2006,
20 SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
21 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 35. (a) This section applies to an initial
22 election:
23 (1) of the members of a governing body or officers that are
24 elected by the voters for a reorganized political subdivision that:
25 (A) is a town; and
26 (B) has town boundaries that encompass part of another town
27 that was part of the reorganization;
28 (2) that is conducted before the reorganization takes effect; and
29 (3) to which IC 3-10-7-1 IC 3-10-5.5 applies.
30 (b) The members of each precinct board shall be jointly appointed
31 by the town election boards of each of the reorganizing political
32 subdivisions.
33 SECTION 39. IC 36-1.5-4-36, AS AMENDED BY P.L.113-2010,
34 SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
35 [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 36. (a) This section applies if
36 section 5 of this chapter requires an election for a reorganization to
37 become effective.
38 (b) At the next:
39 (1) general election, if:
40 (A) the reorganized political subdivision is not a municipality
41 or a school corporation; or
42 (B) the reorganized political subdivision results from a
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

19
1 reorganization including a county and at least one (1)
2 municipality; or
3 (C) the reorganized political subdivision is a municipality
4 to which IC 3-10-5.5 applies;
5 (2) municipal election, if the reorganized political subdivision is
6 a municipality to which IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply; or
7 (3) primary or general election, as specified in an election plan
8 adopted in substantially identical resolutions by the legislative
9 body of each of the participating political subdivisions if the
10 reorganized political subdivision is a school corporation;
11 after the voters approve a reorganization, one (1) set of officers for the
12 reorganized political subdivision having the combined population of
13 the reorganizing political subdivisions shall be elected by the voters in
14 the territory of the reorganized political subdivision as prescribed by
15 statute.
16 (c) In the election described in subsection (b):
17 (1) one (1) member of the legislative body of the reorganized
18 political subdivision shall be elected from each election district
19 established by the reorganizing political subdivisions in
20 substantially identical resolutions adopted by the legislative body
21 of each of the reorganizing political subdivisions; and
22 (2) the total number of at large members shall be elected as
23 prescribed by statute for the reorganized political subdivision.
24 (d) If appointed officers are required in the reorganized political
25 subdivision, one (1) set of appointed officers shall be appointed for the
26 reorganized political subdivision. The appointments shall be made as
27 required by statute for the reorganized political subdivision. Any
28 statute requiring an appointed officer to reside in the political
29 subdivision where the appointed officer resides shall be treated as
30 permitting the appointed officer to reside in any part of the territory of
31 the reorganized political subdivision.
32 SECTION 40. IC 36-3-3-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
33 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A mayor,
34 who is the executive of both the consolidated city and the county, shall
35 be elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6, whichever is applicable to
36 the consolidated city, by the voters of the whole county.
37 (b) To be eligible to serve as the executive, a person must meet the
38 qualifications prescribed by IC 3-8-1-24.
39 (c) The term of office of an executive is four (4) years, beginning at
40 noon on January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is
41 elected and qualified.
42 SECTION 41. IC 36-3-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.193-2021,
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

20
1 SECTION 109, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2 [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A city-county council,
3 which is the legislative body of both the consolidated city and the
4 county, shall be elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6, whichever is
5 applicable to the consolidated city, by the voters of the county. The
6 city-county council consists of twenty-five (25) members.
7 (b) To be eligible to serve as a member of the legislative body, a
8 person must meet the qualifications prescribed by IC 3-8-1-25.
9 (c) A member of the legislative body must reside within:
10 (1) the county as provided in Article 6, Section 6 of the
11 Constitution of the State of Indiana; and
12 (2) the district from which the member was elected.
13 (d) A vacancy in the legislative body occurs whenever a member:
14 (1) dies, resigns, or is removed from office;
15 (2) ceases to be a resident of the district from which the member
16 was elected; or
17 (3) is incapacitated to the extent that the member is unable to
18 perform the member's duties for more than six (6) months.
19 (e) The vacancy shall be filled under IC 3-13-8.
20 (f) The term of office of a member of the legislative body is four (4)
21 years, beginning at noon on January 1 after election and continuing
22 until a successor is elected and qualified.
23 SECTION 42. IC 36-4-1-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
24 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) Whenever
25 the classification of a city under section 1 of this chapter changes due
26 to a change in the city's population, the city shall be governed by the
27 laws applicable to its new class, except as provided by subsection (b).
28 (b) The membership of a city legislative body remains unchanged
29 until the expiration of the terms of its members, despite a change in the
30 classification of the city for any reason. At the:
31 (1) municipal election, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the city;
32 or
33 (2) general election, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the city;
34 preceding the expiration of those terms, the number of members of the
35 legislative body required by the laws applicable to its new class shall
36 be elected. The powers, duties, functions, and office of an elected
37 official of a city shall remain unchanged until the expiration of the term
38 of the elected official, despite a change in city classification for any
39 reason.
40 SECTION 43. IC 36-4-1.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.202-2013,
41 SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
42 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) A town legislative body may satisfy the
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

21
1 requirements of this section in an ordinance adopted either before or
2 after the town's voters vote on the question described in section 2 of
3 this chapter.
4 (b) If a resolution is adopted under section 2 of this chapter, the
5 town legislative body shall adopt an ordinance providing for the
6 transition from governance as a town to governance as a city. The
7 ordinance adopted under this section must include the following
8 details:
9 (1) A division of the town into city legislative body districts as
10 provided in the applicable provisions of IC 36-4-6.
11 (2) Provisions for the election of the following officers:
12 (A) The city executive.
13 (B) The members of the city legislative body.
14 (C) The city clerk or city clerk-treasurer as appropriate under
15 IC 36-4-10.
16 (3) The date of the first election of the city officers. The first
17 election may be held only on the date of the next general election
18 or municipal election whichever is earlier, at which officers are
19 elected in the municipality under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6,
20 following the date fixed for an election under section 2 of this
21 chapter on the question of whether the town should be changed
22 into a city. Candidates for election to the city offices shall be
23 nominated:
24 (A) at the corresponding primary election during a general
25 election year or a municipal election year; or
26 (B) as otherwise provided in IC 3.
27 (4) Subject to section 4 of this chapter, the term of office of each
28 city officer elected at the first election of city officers.
29 (5) Any other details the town legislative body considers useful in
30 providing for the transition of the town into a city.
31 (c) An ordinance adopted under this section is effective only if the
32 voters of the town approve the conversion of the town into a city under
33 section 2(6) of this chapter.
34 (d) The provisions of an ordinance adopted under this section are
35 subject to all other laws governing the structure of city government.
36 (e) Subject to this chapter, the town legislative body or the city
37 legislative body (after the town is changed into a city) may amend an
38 ordinance adopted under this section.
39 SECTION 44. IC 36-4-1.5-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.111-2005,
40 SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
41 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the term
42 of office of the city officers elected at the first election of city officers
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

22
1 held under the ordinance adopted under section 3 of this chapter:
2 (1) begins on January 1 after the first election of city officers; and
3 (2) may not extend after December 31 of the next:
4 (A) municipal election year that occurs after the first election
5 of city officers, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the city; or
6 (B) general election year that occurs after the first election
7 of city officers, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the city.
8 (b) The ordinance adopted under section 3 of this chapter may
9 provide for a shorter term of office for specified members of the city
10 legislative body to stagger terms as permitted under IC 3 and IC 36-4-6.
11 However, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the city, the ordinance
12 may provide for a shorter term of office under this subsection only
13 if a general election will occur in an even-numbered year before the
14 next municipal election occurring in the odd-numbered year before
15 a presidential election year, after the first election of city officers.
16 (c) After the first municipal election after the first election of city
17 officers, the term of office of each city officer is four (4) years.
18 SECTION 45. IC 36-4-2-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
19 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. An election held
20 under section 2 or 3 of this chapter may not be held in a calendar year
21 in which a general municipal election is to be held in the
22 odd-numbered year before a presidential election year.
23 SECTION 46. IC 36-4-2-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
24 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10. (a) At the next
25 general municipal election After a vote in favor of a merger at an
26 election held under section 2 or 3 of this chapter, one (1) set of officers
27 for a municipality having the combined population of the merging
28 municipalities shall be elected by the voters of the merging
29 municipalities as prescribed by statute, except that:
30 (1) one (1) member of the municipal legislative body shall be
31 elected from each district established under section 12 of this
32 chapter; and
33 (2) the total number of at large members prescribed by statute for
34 the municipal legislative body shall be elected.
35 (b) An election under subsection (a) must be held at the next:
36 (1) municipal election occurring in the odd-numbered year
37 before a presidential election year, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not
38 apply to each of the merging municipalities; or
39 (2) general election, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to one (1) or more
40 of the merging municipalities.
41 SECTION 47. IC 36-4-2-12 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
42 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 12. (a) The
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

23
1 legislative bodies of municipalities that vote to merge under this
2 chapter shall meet in joint session at the hall of the municipality having
3 the largest population at 8 p.m. on the second Monday of January of the
4 next year in which a:
5 (1) general municipal election is to be held, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies
6 to one (1) or more of the merging municipalities; or
7 (2) municipal election is to be held in the odd-numbered year
8 before a presidential election year, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not
9 apply to each of the merging municipalities.
10 (b) At the joint meeting, the legislative bodies shall:
11 (1) elect a presiding officer and clerk; and
12 (2) fix, by joint resolution, the boundaries of the districts from
13 which members will be elected to the legislative body of the new
14 municipality.
15 The legislative bodies shall fix the district boundaries so that, as nearly
16 as is possible, all parts of the merging municipalities have equal
17 representation in the legislative body of the new municipality. The
18 district boundaries fixed under this subsection constitute the district
19 boundaries for the new municipality until they are altered by the
20 legislative body of the new municipality.
21 (b) (c) If any territory in the municipality is not included in one (1)
22 of the districts established under subsection (a), (b), the territory is
23 included in the district that:
24 (1) is contiguous to that territory; and
25 (2) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
26 territory.
27 (c) (d) If any territory in the municipality is included in more than
28 one (1) of the districts established under subsection (a), (b), the
29 territory is included in the district that:
30 (1) is one (1) of the districts in which the territory is described in
31 the joint resolution adopted under subsection (a); (b);
32 (2) is contiguous to that territory; and
33 (3) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
34 territory.
35 (d) (e) A copy of the joint resolution passed under subsection (a) (b)
36 shall be:
37 (1) certified by the presiding officer;
38 (2) attested by the clerk; and
39 (3) filed with the legislative body of each of the merging
40 municipalities and the circuit court clerk of each county in which
41 the municipalities are located.
42 SECTION 48. IC 36-4-5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

24
1 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A mayor,
2 who is the city executive, shall be elected under:
3 (1) IC 3-10-5.5; or
4 (2) IC 3-10-6;
5 as applicable to the city, by the voters of each city.
6 (b) A person is eligible to be a city executive only if the person
7 meets the qualifications prescribed by IC 3-8-1-26.
8 (c) Residency in territory that is annexed by the city before the
9 election is considered residency for the purposes of subsection (b),
10 even if the annexation takes effect less than one (1) year before the
11 election.
12 (d) The city executive must reside within the city as provided in
13 Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of Indiana. The
14 executive forfeits office if the executive ceases to be a resident of the
15 city.
16 (e) The term of office of a city executive is four (4) years, beginning
17 at noon on January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is
18 elected and qualified.
19 SECTION 49. IC 36-4-6-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
20 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A common
21 council, which is the city legislative body, shall be elected under:
22 (1) IC 3-10-5.5; or
23 (2) IC 3-10-6;
24 as applicable to the city, by the voters of each city.
25 (b) A person is eligible to be a member of the legislative body only
26 if the person meets the qualifications prescribed by IC 3-8-1-27.
27 (c) Residency in territory that is annexed by the city before the
28 person files a declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination is
29 considered residency for the purposes of subsection (b), even if the
30 annexation takes effect less than one (1) year before the election.
31 (d) A member of the legislative body must reside within:
32 (1) the city as provided in Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution
33 of the State of Indiana; and
34 (2) the district from which the member was elected, if applicable.
35 (e) A member forfeits office if the member ceases to be a resident
36 of the district or city.
37 (f) The term of office of a member of the legislative body is four (4)
38 years, beginning at noon on January 1 after election and continuing
39 until a successor is elected and qualified.
40 SECTION 50. IC 36-4-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2022,
41 SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
42 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) This section applies only to second class
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

25
1 cities.
2 (b) The legislative body shall adopt an ordinance to divide the city
3 into six (6) districts that:
4 (1) are composed of contiguous territory, except for territory that
5 is not contiguous to any other part of the city;
6 (2) are reasonably compact;
7 (3) do not cross precinct boundary lines, except as provided in
8 subsection (c) or (d); and
9 (4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
10 (c) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
11 precinct boundary line if:
12 (1) more than one (1) member of the legislative body elected from
13 the districts established under subsection (b) resides in one (1)
14 precinct established under IC 3-11-1.5 after the most recent
15 municipal election for members of the city legislative body; and
16 (2) following the establishment of a legislative body district
17 whose boundary crosses a precinct boundary line, not more than
18 one (1) member of the legislative body elected from districts
19 resides within the same city legislative body district.
20 (d) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
21 precinct line if the districts would not otherwise contain, as nearly as
22 is possible, equal population.
23 (e) A city legislative body district with a boundary described by
24 subsection (c) or (d) may not cross a census block boundary line:
25 (1) except when following a precinct boundary line; or
26 (2) unless the city legislative body certifies in the ordinance that
27 the census block has no population, and is not likely to ever have
28 population.
29 (f) The legislative body may not adopt an ordinance dividing the city
30 into districts with boundaries described by subsection (c) or (d) unless
31 the clerk of the city mails a written notice to the circuit court clerk. The
32 notice must:
33 (1) state that the legislative body is considering the adoption of an
34 ordinance described by this subsection; and
35 (2) be mailed not later than ten (10) days before the legislative
36 body adopts the ordinance.
37 (g) Except as provided in subsection (j), the division under
38 subsection (b) shall be made only at times permitted under IC 3-5-10.
39 (h) The legislative body is composed of six (6) members elected
40 from the districts established under subsection (b) and three (3) at-large
41 members.
42 (i) Each voter of the city may vote for three (3) candidates for
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

26
1 at-large membership and one (1) candidate from the district in which
2 the voter resides. The three (3) at-large candidates receiving the most
3 votes from the whole city and the district candidates receiving the most
4 votes from their respective districts are elected to the legislative body.
5 (j) If the legislative body determines that a division under subsection
6 (g) is not required, the legislative body shall adopt an ordinance
7 recertifying that the districts as drawn comply with this section.
8 (k) A copy of the ordinance establishing districts or a recertification
9 adopted under this section must be filed with the circuit court clerk of
10 the county that contains the greatest population of the city not later than
11 thirty (30) days after the ordinance or recertification is adopted. The
12 filing must include a map of the district boundaries:
13 (1) adopted under subsection (b); or
14 (2) recertified under subsection (j).
15 (l) The limitations set forth in this section are part of the ordinance,
16 but do not have to be specifically set forth in the ordinance. The
17 ordinance must be construed, if possible, to comply with this chapter.
18 If a provision of the ordinance or an application of the ordinance
19 violates this chapter, the invalidity does not affect the other provisions
20 or applications of the ordinance that can be given effect without the
21 invalid provision or application. The provisions of the ordinance are
22 severable.
23 (m) IC 3-5-10 applies to a plan established under this section.
24 SECTION 51. IC 36-4-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2022,
25 SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
26 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) This section applies to third class cities,
27 except as provided by section 5 of this chapter.
28 (b) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
29 described by subsection (j) or (m). The legislative body shall adopt an
30 ordinance to divide the city into five (5) districts that:
31 (1) are composed of contiguous territory, except for territory that
32 is not contiguous to any other part of the city;
33 (2) are reasonably compact;
34 (3) do not cross precinct boundary lines except as provided in
35 subsection (c) or (d); and
36 (4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
37 (c) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
38 precinct boundary line if:
39 (1) more than one (1) member of the legislative body elected from
40 the districts established under subsection (b), (j), or (m) resides in
41 one (1) precinct established under IC 3-11-1.5 after the most
42 recent municipal election for members of the city legislative
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

27
1 body; and
2 (2) following the establishment of a legislative body district
3 whose boundary crosses a precinct boundary line, not more than
4 one (1) member of the legislative body elected from the districts
5 resides within the same city legislative body district.
6 (d) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
7 precinct line if the districts would not otherwise contain, as nearly as
8 is possible, equal population.
9 (e) A city legislative body district with a boundary described by
10 subsection (c) or (d) may not cross a census block boundary line:
11 (1) except when following a precinct boundary line; or
12 (2) unless the city legislative body certifies in the ordinance that
13 the census block has no population, and is not likely to ever have
14 population.
15 (f) The legislative body may not adopt an ordinance dividing the city
16 into districts with boundaries described by subsection (c) or (d) unless
17 the clerk of the city mails a written notice to the circuit court clerk. The
18 notice must:
19 (1) state that the legislative body is considering the adoption of an
20 ordinance described by this subsection; and
21 (2) be mailed not later than ten (10) days before the legislative
22 body adopts the ordinance.
23 (g) Except as provided in subsection (o), the division under
24 subsection (b), (j), or (m) shall be made only at times permitted under
25 IC 3-5-10.
26 (h) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
27 described by subsection (j) or (m). The legislative body is composed of
28 five (5) members elected from the districts established under
29 subsection (b) and two (2) at-large members.
30 (i) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
31 described by subsection (j) or (m). Each voter of the city may vote for
32 two (2) candidates for at-large membership and one (1) candidate from
33 the district in which the voter resides. The two (2) at-large candidates
34 receiving the most votes from the whole city and the district candidates
35 receiving the most votes from their respective districts are elected to
36 the legislative body.
37 (j) A city may adopt an ordinance under this subsection to divide the
38 city into four (4) districts that:
39 (1) are composed of contiguous territory;
40 (2) are reasonably compact;
41 (3) do not cross precinct boundary lines, except as provided in
42 subsection (c) or (d); and
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

28
1 (4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
2 (k) This subsection applies to a city with an ordinance described by
3 subsection (j). The legislative body is composed of four (4) members
4 elected from the districts established under subsection (j) and three (3)
5 at-large members.
6 (l) This subsection applies to a city with an ordinance described by
7 subsection (j). Each voter of the city may vote for three (3) candidates
8 for at-large membership and one (1) candidate from the district in
9 which the voter resides. The three (3) at-large candidates receiving the
10 most votes from the whole city and the district candidates receiving the
11 most votes from their respective districts are elected to the legislative
12 body.
13 (m) This subsection applies only if the ordinance adopted under
14 IC 36-4-1.5-3 by the town legislative body of a town that has a
15 population of less than ten thousand (10,000) and that becomes a city
16 specifies that the city legislative body districts are governed by this
17 subsection. The ordinance adopted under IC 36-4-1.5-3(b)(1) dividing
18 the town into city legislative body districts may provide that:
19 (1) the city shall be divided into three (3) districts that:
20 (A) are composed of contiguous territory;
21 (B) are reasonably compact;
22 (C) do not cross precinct boundary lines, except as provided in
23 subsection (c) or (d); and
24 (D) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population; and
25 (2) the legislative body of the city is composed of three (3)
26 members elected from the districts established under this
27 subsection and two (2) at-large members.
28 Each voter of the city may vote for two (2) candidates for at-large
29 membership and one (1) candidate from the district in which the voter
30 resides. The two (2) at-large candidates receiving the most votes from
31 the whole city and the district candidates receiving the most votes from
32 their respective districts are elected to the legislative body.
33 (n) A copy of the ordinance establishing districts or a recertification
34 adopted under this section must be filed with the circuit court clerk of
35 the county that contains the greatest population of the city no not later
36 than thirty (30) days after the ordinance or recertification is adopted.
37 The filing must include a map of the district boundaries:
38 (1) adopted under subsection (b), (j), or (m); or
39 (2) recertified under subsection (o).
40 (o) If the legislative body determines that a division under
41 subsection (g) is not required, the legislative body shall adopt an
42 ordinance recertifying that the districts as drawn comply with this
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

29
1 section.
2 (p) The limitations set forth in this section are part of the ordinance,
3 but do not have to be specifically set forth in the ordinance. The
4 ordinance must be construed, if possible, to comply with this chapter.
5 If a provision of the ordinance or an application of the ordinance
6 violates this chapter, the invalidity does not affect the other provisions
7 or applications of the ordinance that can be given effect without the
8 invalid provision or application. The provisions of the ordinance are
9 severable.
10 (q) IC 3-5-10 applies to a plan established under this section.
11 SECTION 52. IC 36-4-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2022,
12 SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
13 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) This section applies to third class cities
14 having a population of less than ten thousand (10,000). The legislative
15 body of such a city may, by ordinance adopted after June 30, 2010, and
16 during a year in which an election of the legislative body will not
17 occur, decide to be governed by this section instead of section 4 of this
18 chapter. The legislative body districts created by an ordinance adopted
19 under this subsection apply to the first election of the legislative body
20 held after the date the ordinance is adopted. The clerk of the legislative
21 body shall send a certified copy of any ordinance adopted under this
22 subsection to the secretary of the county election board.
23 (b) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
24 described by subsection (j). The legislative body shall adopt an
25 ordinance to divide the city into four (4) districts that:
26 (1) are composed of contiguous territory, except for territory that
27 is not contiguous to any other part of the city;
28 (2) are reasonably compact;
29 (3) do not cross precinct boundary lines except as provided in
30 subsection (c) or (d); and
31 (4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
32 (c) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
33 precinct boundary line if:
34 (1) more than one (1) member of the legislative body elected from
35 the districts established under subsection (b) or (j) resides in one
36 (1) precinct established under IC 3-11-1.5 after the most recent
37 municipal election for members of the city legislative body; and
38 (2) following the establishment of a legislative body district
39 whose boundary crosses a precinct boundary line, not more than
40 one (1) member of the legislative body elected from the districts
41 resides within the same city legislative body district.
42 (d) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

30
1 precinct line if the districts would not otherwise contain, as nearly as
2 is possible, equal population.
3 (e) A city legislative body district with a boundary described by
4 subsection (c) or (d) may not cross a census block boundary line:
5 (1) except when following a precinct boundary line; or
6 (2) unless the city legislative body certifies in the ordinance that
7 the census block has no population, and is not likely to ever have
8 population.
9 (f) The legislative body may not adopt an ordinance dividing the city
10 into districts with boundaries described by subsection (c) or (d) unless
11 the clerk of the city mails a written notice to the circuit court clerk. The
12 notice must:
13 (1) state that the legislative body is considering the adoption of an
14 ordinance described by this subsection; and
15 (2) be mailed not later than ten (10) days before the legislative
16 body adopts the ordinance.
17 (g) Except as provided in subsection (o), the division under
18 subsection (b) or (j) shall be made only at times permitted under
19 IC 3-5-10.
20 (h) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
21 described by subsection (j). The legislative body is composed of four
22 (4) members elected from the districts established under subsection (b)
23 and one (1) at-large member.
24 (i) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
25 described by subsection (j). Each voter may vote for one (1) candidate
26 for at-large membership and one (1) candidate from the district in
27 which the voter resides. The at-large candidate receiving the most votes
28 from the whole city and the district candidates receiving the most votes
29 from their respective districts are elected to the legislative body.
30 (j) A city may adopt an ordinance under this subsection to divide the
31 city into three (3) districts that:
32 (1) are composed of contiguous territory, except for territory that
33 is not contiguous to any other part of the city;
34 (2) are reasonably compact;
35 (3) do not cross precinct boundary lines, except as provided in
36 subsection (c) or (d); and
37 (4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
38 (k) This subsection applies to a city with an ordinance described by
39 subsection (j). The legislative body is composed of three (3) members
40 elected from the districts established under subsection (j) and two (2)
41 at-large members.
42 (l) This subsection applies to a city with an ordinance described by
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

31
1 subsection (j). Each voter of the city may vote for two (2) candidates
2 for at-large membership and one (1) candidate from the district in
3 which the voter resides. The two (2) at-large candidates receiving the
4 most votes from the whole city and the district candidates receiving the
5 most votes from their respective districts are elected to the legislative
6 body.
7 (m) This subsection applies to a city having a population of less than
8 seven thousand (7,000). A legislative body of such a city that has, by
9 resolution adopted before May 7, 1991, decided to continue an election
10 process that permits each voter of the city to vote for one (1) candidate
11 at large and one (1) candidate from each of its four (4) council districts
12 may hold elections using that voting arrangement. The at-large
13 candidate and the candidate from each district receiving the most votes
14 from the whole city are elected to the legislative body. The districts
15 established in cities adopting such a resolution may cross precinct
16 boundary lines.
17 (n) A copy of the ordinance establishing districts or a recertification
18 under this section must be filed with the circuit court clerk of the
19 county that contains the greatest population of the city not later than
20 thirty (30) days after the ordinance or recertification is adopted. The
21 filing must include a map of the district boundaries:
22 (1) adopted under subsection (b) or (j); or
23 (2) recertified under subsection (o).
24 (o) If the legislative body determines that a division under
25 subsection (b) or (j) is not required, the legislative body shall adopt an
26 ordinance recertifying that the districts as drawn comply with this
27 section.
28 (p) The limitations set forth in this section are part of the ordinance,
29 but do not have to be specifically set forth in the ordinance. The
30 ordinance must be construed, if possible, to comply with this chapter.
31 If a provision of the ordinance or an application of the ordinance
32 violates this chapter, the invalidity does not affect the other provisions
33 or applications of the ordinance that can be given effect without the
34 invalid provision or application. The provisions of the ordinance are
35 severable.
36 (q) IC 3-5-10 applies to a plan established under this section.
37 SECTION 53. IC 36-5-1-10.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2022,
38 SECTION 164, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
39 [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10.1. (a) If a majority of the
40 voters voting on the public question under section 8 of this chapter vote
41 "yes", the county executive shall adopt an ordinance incorporating the
42 town.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

32
1 (b) An ordinance adopted under subsection (a) must:
2 (1) either:
3 (A) provide that all members of the town legislative body are
4 to be elected at large (if the town would have a population of
5 less than three thousand five hundred (3,500); or
6 (B) divide the town into not less than at least three (3) nor and
7 not more than seven (7) districts; and
8 (2) direct the county election board to conduct an election in the
9 town on the date of the next general or municipal election to be
10 held in any precincts in the county.
11 An election conducted under this section must comply with IC 3
12 concerning town elections. If the date that an ordinance is adopted
13 under this section is not later than June 1 of a general or municipal
14 election year, the election must be conducted on the date of the next
15 general or municipal election held in any precincts in the county after
16 the election for which absentee balloting is being conducted. However,
17 a primary election may not be conducted before an election conducted
18 under this section, regardless of the population of the town.
19 (c) Districts established by an ordinance adopted under this section
20 must comply with IC 3-11-1.5.
21 (d) If any territory in the town is not included in one (1) of the
22 districts established under this section, the territory is included in the
23 district that:
24 (1) is contiguous to that territory; and
25 (2) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
26 territory.
27 (e) If any territory in the town is included in more than one (1) of the
28 districts established under this section, the territory is included in the
29 district that:
30 (1) is one (1) of the districts in which the territory is described in
31 the ordinance adopted under this section;
32 (2) is contiguous to that territory; and
33 (3) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
34 territory.
35 (f) An ordinance adopted under this section becomes effective when
36 filed with:
37 (1) the office of the secretary of state; and
38 (2) the circuit court clerk of each county in which the town is
39 located.
40 (g) Each county that contains a part of the proposed town must
41 adopt identical ordinances providing for the incorporation of the town.
42 SECTION 54. IC 36-5-1.1-10.6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2022,
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

33
1 SECTION 169, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2 [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10.6. (a) This section applies
3 to included towns.
4 (b) The dissolution of a town under this section may be instituted by
5 filing a petition with the county board of registration. The petition must
6 be signed by at least the number of the registered voters of the town
7 required to place a candidate on the ballot under IC 3-8-6-3. The
8 petition must be filed not later than June 1 of a year in which a general
9 or municipal election will be held.
10 (c) If a petition meets the criteria set forth in subsection (b), the
11 county board of registration shall certify the public question to the
12 county election board under IC 3-10-9-3. The county election board
13 shall place the question of dissolution on the ballot provided for voters
14 in the included town at the first general or municipal election following
15 certification. The question shall be placed on the ballot in the form
16 prescribed by IC 3-10-9-4 and must state "Shall the town of ________
17 dissolve?".
18 (d) If the public question is approved by a majority of the voters
19 voting on the question, the county election board shall file a copy of the
20 certification prepared under IC 3-12-4-9 concerning the public question
21 described by this section with the following:
22 (1) The circuit court clerk of the county.
23 (2) The office of the secretary of state.
24 (e) Dissolution occurs:
25 (1) at least sixty (60) days after certification under IC 3-12-4-9;
26 and
27 (2) when the certification is filed under subsection (d).
28 (f) When a town is dissolved under this section:
29 (1) the territory included within the town when the ordinance was
30 adopted becomes a part of the consolidated city;
31 (2) the books and records of the town become the property of the
32 county executive;
33 (3) the property owned by the town after payment of debts and
34 liabilities shall be disposed of by the county executive; and
35 (4) the county executive shall deposit any proceeds remaining
36 after payment of debts and liabilities into the county general fund.
37 (g) The dissolution of a town under this section does not affect the
38 validity of a contract to which the town is a party.
39 SECTION 55. IC 36-5-2-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
40 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. The town
41 council elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 or IC 3-10-7 is the
42 town legislative body. The president of the town council selected under
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

34
1 section 7 of this chapter is the town executive.
2 SECTION 56. IC 36-5-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2015,
3 SECTION 60, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
4 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
5 (c), (d), or (e), (f), or (g), the term of office of a member of the
6 legislative body is four (4) years, beginning at noon January 1 after the
7 member's election and continuing until the member's successor is
8 elected and qualified.
9 (b) The term of office of a member of the legislative body appointed
10 to fill a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of town
11 legislative body members under section 4.2 of this chapter:
12 (1) begins when the ordinance increasing the number of
13 legislative body members takes effect, or when the member is
14 appointed under IC 3-13-9-4, if the appointment is made after the
15 ordinance takes effect; and
16 (2) continues until:
17 (A) noon January 1 following the next municipal election
18 scheduled under IC 3-10-6-5 or IC 3-10-7-6 for members of
19 the town legislative body; and until
20 (B) the member's successor is elected and qualified.
21 (c) The term of office of a member of the legislative body elected
22 under IC 36-5-1-10.1 following the incorporation of the town:
23 (1) begins at noon November 30 following the election; and
24 (2) continues until:
25 (A) noon January 1 following the next municipal election
26 scheduled under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6-5 or IC 3-10-7-6, as
27 applicable to the municipality; and until
28 (B) the member's successor is elected and qualified.
29 (d) The term of office of a member of the legislative body subject
30 to IC 3-10-6-2.5(d)(1) is three (3) years, beginning at noon January 1
31 after the member's election and continuing until the member's
32 successor is elected and qualified.
33 (e) The term of office of a member of a legislative body subject to
34 an ordinance described by IC 3-10-6-2.6 is one (1) year, beginning at
35 noon January 1 after the member's election and continuing until the
36 member's successor is elected and qualified.
37 (f) The term of office of a member of a legislative body subject to
38 an ordinance described by IC 3-10-7-2.7 is:
39 (1) three (3) years if the member is elected at the next municipal
40 election not conducted in a general election year; and
41 (2) four (4) years for the successors of a member of a legislative
42 body described in subdivision (1);
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

35
1 beginning noon January 1 after election and continuing until a
2 successor is elected and qualified.
3 (g) The term of office of a member of a legislative body subject to
4 an ordinance described by IC 3-10-7-2.9 is:
5 (1) the term of office provided by the ordinance, not to exceed
6 four (4) years, for a member of the legislative body elected in the
7 first election cycle after adoption of the ordinance; and
8 (2) four (4) years for the successors of the member of a legislative
9 body described in subdivision (1).
10 SECTION 57. IC 36-5-2-4.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2022,
11 SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
12 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.1. (a) The legislative body may, by
13 ordinance, divide the town into districts for the purpose of conducting
14 elections of town officers.
15 (b) A town legislative body district must comply with the following
16 standards:
17 (1) The district must be composed of contiguous territory, except
18 for territory that is not contiguous to any other part of the town.
19 (2) The district must be reasonably compact.
20 (3) The district must contain, as nearly as is possible, equal
21 population.
22 (4) The district may not cross a census block boundary except
23 when following a precinct boundary line or unless the ordinance
24 specifies that the census block has no population and is not likely
25 to have population before the effective date of the next federal
26 decennial census.
27 (5) The district may not cross precinct lines, except as provided
28 in subsection (c).
29 (c) The boundary of a town legislative body district established
30 under subsection (a) may cross a precinct boundary line if:
31 (1) the legislative body provides by ordinance under section 5 of
32 this chapter that all legislative body members are to be elected at
33 large by the voters of the whole town; or
34 (2) the district would not otherwise contain, as nearly as is
35 possible, equal population.
36 (d) If any territory in the town is not included in one (1) of the
37 districts established under this section, the territory is included in the
38 district that:
39 (1) is contiguous to that territory; and
40 (2) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
41 territory.
42 (e) The ordinance may be appealed in the manner prescribed by
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

36
1 IC 34-13-6. If the town is located in two (2) or more counties, the
2 appeal may be filed in the circuit or superior court of any of those
3 counties.
4 (f) This subsection does not apply to a town with an ordinance
5 described by subsection (g). Except as provided in subsection (j), the
6 division permitted by subsection (a) shall be made only at times
7 permitted under IC 3-5-10.
8 (g) This subsection applies to a town having a population of less
9 than three thousand five hundred (3,500). The town legislative body
10 may adopt an ordinance providing that:
11 (1) town legislative body districts are abolished; and
12 (2) all members of the legislative body are elected at large.
13 (h) An ordinance described by subsection (g):
14 (1) may not be adopted or repealed during a year in which a
15 municipal an election for municipal office is scheduled to be
16 conducted in the town under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6; or
17 IC 3-10-7; and
18 (2) is effective upon passage.
19 (i) A copy of the ordinance establishing districts or a recertification
20 under this section must be filed with the circuit court clerk of the
21 county that contains the greatest population of the town not later than
22 thirty (30) days after the ordinance or recertification is adopted. The
23 filing must include a map of the district boundaries:
24 (1) adopted under subsection (a); or
25 (2) recertified under subsection (j).
26 (j) If the legislative body determines that a division under subsection
27 (a) is not required, the legislative body shall adopt an ordinance
28 recertifying that the districts as drawn comply with this section.
29 (k) The limitations set forth in this section are part of the ordinance,
30 but do not have to be specifically set forth in the ordinance. The
31 ordinance must be construed, if possible, to comply with this chapter.
32 If a provision of the ordinance or an application of the ordinance
33 violates this chapter, the invalidity does not affect the other provisions
34 or applications of the ordinance that can be given effect without the
35 invalid provision or application. The provisions of the ordinance are
36 severable.
37 (l) This subsection applies to a town having a population of less than
38 three thousand five hundred (3,500). If the town legislative body has
39 not:
40 (1) adopted an ordinance under subsection (a) and subject to
41 subsection (f) after December 31, 2011; or
42 (2) adopted an ordinance recertifying districts under subsection
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

37
1 (j) after December 31, 2011;
2 the town legislative body districts are abolished, effective January 1,
3 2018. A town described by this subsection may adopt an ordinance to
4 establish town legislative body districts in accordance with subsection
5 (a) and subject to subsection (f) after January 1, 2018.
6 (m) IC 3-5-10 applies to a plan established under this section.
7 SECTION 58. IC 36-5-2-4.2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
8 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.2. (a) This
9 section applies to the alteration of the number of members of a
10 legislative body.
11 (b) The legislative body may adopt a resolution to submit a public
12 question on the number of legislative body members to the voters of the
13 town. The resolution must state the following:
14 (1) The proposed number of legislative body members, which
15 must be at least three (3) and not more than seven (7).
16 (2) The date of the general municipal, or special election at which
17 the public question will appear on the ballot.
18 (3) That the following question will be placed on the ballot in the
19 form provided by IC 3-10-9-4:
20 "Shall the number of town council members be increased (or
21 decreased, if applicable) from ___________ (insert the current
22 number of members provided for) to _________ (insert the
23 number of members proposed in the resolution)?".
24 (c) IC 3 applies to an election conducted under subsection (b). If the
25 county election board will conduct the election at which the public
26 question will be submitted, the question must be certified to the board
27 under IC 3-10-9-3.
28 (d) If a majority of the votes cast on the question under subsection
29 (b) are in the negative, the legislative body may not adopt a resolution
30 under subsection (b) for at least one (1) year following the date the
31 prior resolution was adopted.
32 (e) If a majority of votes cast on the question under subsection (b)
33 are in the affirmative, the legislative body shall adopt an ordinance at
34 its next regular meeting following the election altering the number of
35 legislative body members to the number specified in the public
36 question. The legislative body may also alter existing districts and
37 establish new districts in the manner prescribed by IC 36-5-1-10.1. An
38 ordinance adopted under this subsection becomes effective January 1
39 following its adoption.
40 (f) If the number of legislative body members is increased, the
41 legislative body shall fill any resulting vacancy under IC 3-13-9-4. The
42 legislative body may fill the vacancy before the ordinance described in
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

38
1 subsection (e) takes effect. However, a town legislative body member
2 appointed under this subsection does not assume office until the
3 beginning of the term specified in section 3 of this chapter.
4 SECTION 59. IC 36-5-2-4.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
5 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.5. (a) This
6 section applies to a town if both of the following apply:
7 (1) The town has a population of more than ten thousand
8 (10,000).
9 (2) The town legislative body adopts an ordinance adopting the
10 provisions of this section. A town may not adopt an ordinance
11 under this section during a year in which municipal elections for
12 municipal offices are held in the town under IC 3-10-5.5 or
13 IC 3-10-6-5.
14 (b) A town legislative body has the following members:
15 (1) Five (5) members, each elected by the voters of a district. The
16 districts are established by ordinance by the town legislative body
17 as provided in this chapter.
18 (2) Two (2) members elected at large by all the voters of the town.
19 (c) An ordinance adopted under this section must provide for the
20 following:
21 (1) Four (4) members of the legislative body are elected during:
22 a
23 (A) the odd-numbered year that municipal elections are held
24 under IC 3-10-6-5. before a presidential election year, if
25 IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the town; or
26 (B) an even-numbered year, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the
27 town.
28 (2) Three (3) members of the legislative body are elected:
29 (A) if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the town, either:
30 (A) (i) during the year before the year described in
31 subdivision (1); (1)(A); or
32 (B) (ii) during the year after the year described in
33 subdivision (1). (1)(A); or
34 (B) if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the town, during the
35 even-numbered year after the year in which members are
36 elected under subdivision (1)(B).
37 The year for elections under this subdivision must be chosen so
38 that during the elections held for the town legislative body under
39 subdivision (4) or (5), a member of the town legislative body does
40 not serve a term of more than four (4) years.
41 (3) The members of the legislative body elected at large may not
42 be elected at the same time.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

39
1 (4) If IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the town, at the first two (2)
2 elections after the ordinance is adopted, members are elected to
3 serve the following terms:
4 (A) Two (2) members elected under subdivision (1) (1)(A) are
5 elected to a four (4) year term and two (2) members elected
6 under subdivision (1) (1)(A) are elected to a three (3) year
7 term.
8 (B) Two (2) members elected under subdivision (2) (2)(A) are
9 elected to a four (4) year term and one (1) member elected
10 under subdivision (2) (2)(A) is elected to a three (3) year term.
11 The ordinance must provide a random procedure to determine
12 which members serve four (4) year terms and which members
13 serve three (3) year terms.
14 (5) If IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the town, at the first two (2)
15 elections after the ordinance is adopted, members are elected
16 to serve the following terms:
17 (A) Two (2) members elected under subdivision (1)(B) are
18 elected to a four (4) year term and two (2) members elected
19 under subdivision (1)(B) are elected to a two (2) year term.
20 (B) Two (2) members elected under subdivision (2)(B) are
21 elected to a four (4) year term and one (1) member elected
22 under subdivision (2)(B) is elected to a two (2) year term.
23 The ordinance must provide a random procedure to
24 determine which members serve four (4) year terms and
25 which members serve two (2) year terms.
26 (5) (6) A member of the town council elected after the elections
27 described in subdivision subdivisions (4) and (5) serves a term
28 of four (4) years.
29 (6) (7) The term of office of a member begins at noon January 1
30 after the member's election.
31 (d) An ordinance adopted under this section may provide that before
32 the first election after adoption of the ordinance, members of the town
33 legislative body added to the legislative body by the ordinance may be
34 appointed to the legislative body by a vote of the current members of
35 the legislative body.
36 (e) After the first two (2) elections held as described in subsection
37 (c)(4) and (c)(5), the town legislative body may adopt an ordinance to
38 do the following:
39 (1) Divide the town into seven (7) districts.
40 (2) Provide that the members elected at large are each elected
41 from a district.
42 An ordinance adopted under this subsection must comply with this
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

40
1 chapter in establishing the districts and provide details to provide a
2 transition from electing two (2) members at large to electing all
3 members from districts.
4 (f) Subject to this section, members of the town legislative body are
5 elected as provided in IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6-4.5, as applicable to
6 the town.
7 SECTION 60. IC 36-5-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2022,
8 SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
9 UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) The clerk-treasurer must reside within
10 the town as provided in Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution of the
11 State of Indiana. The clerk-treasurer forfeits office if the clerk-treasurer
12 ceases to be a resident of the town. An individual who resides in
13 territory that is annexed by the town before the election is considered
14 a resident of the town for purposes of this subsection, even if the
15 annexation took effect less than one (1) year before the election.
16 (b) Except as provided in subsection (c), (d), (e), or (f), (c) or (d),
17 the term of office of the clerk-treasurer is four (4) years, beginning at
18 noon January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is elected
19 and qualified.
20 (c) The term of office of a clerk-treasurer elected under
21 IC 36-5-1-10.1 following the incorporation of the town:
22 (1) begins at noon November 30 following the election; and
23 (2) continues until noon January 1 following the next:
24 (A) municipal election scheduled under IC 3-10-6-5, or
25 IC 3-10-7-6, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the town; or
26 (B) general election that will occur at least three (3) years
27 after the clerk-treasurer's election, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to
28 the town;
29 and until the clerk-treasurer's successor is elected and qualified.
30 (d) The term of office of a clerk-treasurer subject to an ordinance
31 described by IC 3-10-6-2.6 is:
32 (1) one (1) year if the clerk-treasurer is elected at the next
33 municipal election not conducted in a general election year; and
34 (2) four (4) years for the successors of the clerk-treasurer
35 described in subdivision (1);
36 beginning at noon January 1 after the clerk-treasurer's election and
37 continuing until the clerk-treasurer's successor is elected and qualified.
38 (e) The term of office of a clerk-treasurer subject to an ordinance
39 described by IC 3-10-7-2.7 is:
40 (1) three (3) years if the clerk-treasurer is elected at the next
41 municipal election not conducted in a general election year; and
42 (2) four (4) years for the successors of the clerk-treasurer
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

41
1 described in subdivision (1);
2 beginning noon January 1 after the clerk-treasurer's election and
3 continuing until the clerk-treasurer's successor is elected and qualified.
4 (f) The term of office of a clerk-treasurer subject to an ordinance
5 described by IC 3-10-7-2.9 is:
6 (1) the term of office provided by the ordinance, not to exceed
7 four (4) years, for the clerk-treasurer elected in the first election
8 cycle after adoption of the ordinance; and
9 (2) four (4) years for the successors of the clerk-treasurer
10 described in subdivision (1).
11 SECTION 61. IC 36-5-6-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
12 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. The
13 clerk-treasurer shall be elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 or
14 IC 3-10-7 by the voters of the whole town.
15 SECTION 62. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The legislative
16 services agency and the code revision committee shall prepare
17 legislation for introduction in the 2027 regular session of the
18 general assembly to make appropriate changes in statutes as
19 required by this act.
20 (b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
21 SECTION 63. An emergency is declared for this act.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

42
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Elections and Apportionment, to
which was referred House Bill 1055, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1055 as introduced.)
WESCO
Committee Vote: Yeas 9, Nays 3
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Elections, to which was
referred House Bill No. 1055, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 3-5-1-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) Whenever a statute in this title, IC 6, IC 20,
or IC 36 refers to a municipal primary election, the reference is to
the primary election in a municipality at which candidates are
nominated for election to municipal offices, as applicable to the
municipality under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6.
(b) Whenever a statute in this title, IC 6, IC 20, or IC 36 refers
to a municipal election or a municipal general election, the
reference is to the general election in a municipality at which
candidates are elected to municipal offices, as applicable to the
municipality under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6.
SECTION 2. IC 3-5-2.1-68.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 68.5. "Nonpresidential
election year" refers to an even-numbered year that is not a
presidential election year.
SECTION 3. IC 3-5-2.1-82.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 82.8. "Presidential election
year" refers to a year in which an election for electors for
President of the United States is held.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

43
SECTION 4. IC 3-5-3-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2017,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
During the period that begins ninety (90) days before a municipal
primary election and continues until the day after the following
municipal election, all expenses of the primary election and election
that cannot be chargeable directly to any municipality shall be
apportioned as follows:
(1) Twenty-five percent (25%) to the county.
(2) Seventy-five percent (75%) to the municipalities in the county
holding the municipal primary election and municipal election.
(b) The apportionment made under subsection (a) does not apply to
a town that has entered into an agreement with the county under
IC 3-10-7-4 to pay the county a fixed amount for the expenses
described in subsection (a).
(c) (b) This subsection applies to a county that is designated as a
vote center county under IC 3-11-18.1. During the period that begins
ninety (90) days before a municipal primary election and continues
until the day after the following municipal election, all expenses
incurred by the county in conducting the municipal primary election
and municipal election shall be apportioned among the municipalities
in the county holding a municipal primary and municipal election.
SECTION 5. IC 3-5-3-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2017,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c)
and (d), subsection (c), whenever more than one (1) municipality in a
county conducts a municipal primary election, the seventy-five percent
(75%) of expenses that cannot be chargeable directly to any particular
municipality under section 8 of this chapter shall be apportioned to
each municipality in the same ratio that the number of voters who cast
a ballot in the municipality at the municipal primary election bears to
the total number of voters who cast a ballot in all of the municipalities
in the county at that municipal primary election.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), subsection (c),
whenever more than one (1) municipality in a county conducts a
municipal election, the seventy-five percent (75%) of expenses that are
not chargeable directly to any particular municipality under section 8
of this chapter must be apportioned to each municipality in the same
ratio that the number of voters who cast a ballot in the municipality at
the municipal election bears to the total number of voters who cast a
ballot in all of the municipalities in the county that conducted a
municipal election.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

44
(c) The apportionment made under subsection (a) does not apply to
a town that has entered into an agreement with the county under
IC 3-10-7-4 to pay the county a fixed amount for the expenses
described in subsection (a).
(d) (c) This subsection
(1) applies to a county designated as a vote center county under
IC 3-11-18.1. and
(2) does not apply to a town that has entered into an agreement
with the county under IC 3-10-7-4 to pay the county a fixed
amount for its municipal primary election and municipal election
expenses.
All expenses incurred by the county in conducting the municipal
primary election and municipal election shall be apportioned to each
municipality in the same ratio that the number of voters who cast a
ballot in the municipality at the municipal primary election or the
municipal election bears to the total number of voters who cast a ballot
in all of the municipalities in the county at that municipal primary
election or municipal election.
SECTION 6. IC 3-6-5-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.258-2013,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 14. (a) Each county election board, in addition
to duties otherwise prescribed by law, shall do the following:
(1) Conduct all elections and administer the election laws within
the county, except as provided in IC 3-8-5 and IC 3-10-7 for town
conventions and municipal elections in certain small towns.
(2) Prepare all ballots.
(3) Distribute all ballots to all of the precincts in the county.
(b) Not later than the Monday before distributing ballots and voting
systems to the precincts in the county, the county election board shall
notify the county chairman of each major political party and, upon
request, the chairman of any other bona fide political party in the
county, that sample ballots are available for inspection.
SECTION 7. IC 3-6-5-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2017,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
this section applies when an election is conducted in a political
subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13 and other than a county) that
contains territory in more than one (1) county.
(b) This section does not apply to an election
(1) conducted at the same time as a primary or general election
during an even-numbered year. or
(2) conducted in a town by a town election board under IC 3-10-7.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

45
(c) To the extent authorized by this section, the county election
board of the county that contains the greatest percentage of population
of the political subdivision shall conduct all elections for the political
subdivision. The county election board may designate polling places
for the election, which may be located in any county in which the
political subdivision is located, and shall appoint precinct election
officers to conduct the election upon nomination by the county
chairman of the county where the precinct is located, or by filling a
vacancy if a nomination is not timely made. However, each county
election board shall provide poll lists for voters, receive and approve
absentee ballot applications, issue certificates of error or other
documents for the voters of that county, print ballots for the municipal
or special election, and conduct activity required to canvass the votes
under IC 3-12-5-2(b).
SECTION 8. IC 3-6-6-27 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 27. The county executive shall fix the compensation
paid under sections 25 and 26 of this chapter for all elections except
municipal elections held by towns under IC 3-10-7. The fiscal body of
a town holding a municipal election under IC 3-10-7 shall fix the
compensation paid under sections 25 and 26 of this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 3-8-5-14.3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 14.3. If a
convention or a primary election is not required under section 10 of this
chapter: notwithstanding IC 3-10-7:
(1) a municipal primary election or town convention may not be
held; and
(2) each candidate who filed a declaration of candidacy shall be
placed on the municipal election ballot. unless IC 3-10-7-6(b)
applies.
SECTION 10. IC 3-8-5-14.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.278-2019,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 14.5. (a) A town election board or circuit
court clerk conducting a municipal election under IC 3-10-7
IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 may not include the name of a candidate
nominated by a town convention on the municipal election ballot if the
person files a notice to withdraw with the clerk. The circuit court clerk
shall notify the town election board of any candidate withdrawal filed
under this subsection not later than the deadline for the clerk to file a
copy of the certification of nomination under section 13(e) of this
chapter.
(b) The notice to withdraw must:
(1) be signed and acknowledged before an officer authorized to
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

46
take acknowledgments of deeds;
(2) have the certificate of acknowledgment appended to the
notice; and
(3) be filed with the clerk no later than noon three (3) days
following the adjournment of the convention.
SECTION 11. IC 3-8-6-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.194-2013,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11. (a) Whenever a town is wholly or partly
located in a county having a consolidated city, a petition of nomination
must be filed with the circuit court clerk of the county having the
consolidated city.
(b) Whenever a town not described in subsection (a) has entered
into an agreement with a county under IC 3-10-7-4, the petition must
be filed with the county voter registration office of that county.
(c) (b) When a petition is filed under subsection (a) or (b) for
nomination to an office whose election district is in more than one (1)
county, the circuit court clerk or board of registration shall examine the
voter registration records of each county in the election district to
determine if each petitioner is eligible to vote for the candidates being
nominated by the petition.
SECTION 12. IC 3-10-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 5.5. Elections for Municipal Offices
Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this chapter
applies to an election for a municipal office after June 30, 2026, for
a:
(1) town that has a population of not more than ten thousand
(10,000);
(2) town that has a population of more than ten thousand
(10,000) that has not adopted a resolution under section 2 of
this chapter; and
(3) city that has adopted a resolution under section 2 of this
chapter.
(b) This chapter does not apply to the town of Vernon
(incorporated under Local Acts 1851, c.1, as amended).
Sec. 2. (a) The legislative body (as defined in IC 36-1-2-9) of a
town that has a population of more than ten thousand (10,000) may
adopt a resolution, by majority vote, not later than December 1,
2026, providing that the municipality elects to hold municipal
elections on odd-numbered years under IC 3-10-6.
(b) The legislative body (as defined in IC 36-1-2-9) of a city may
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

47
adopt a resolution, by majority vote, not later than December 1,
2026, providing that the municipality elects to hold municipal
elections during the general election in each presidential year.
(c) Except as provided in section 6(a), 6(b), and 6(c) of this
chapter, if a legislative body:
(1) of a town that has a population of more than ten thousand
(10,000) does not adopt a resolution under subsection (a); or
(2) of a city does adopt a resolution under subsection (b);
this chapter applies to the municipality.
(d) A copy of a resolution adopted under subsection (a) or (b)
shall be filed with the secretary of state.
Sec. 3. (a) An individual elected to a municipal office at the 2023
municipal election is entitled to hold over after the expiration of the
individual's term until a successor has been elected and qualified
under subsection (b).
(b) The successor of an individual elected to a municipal office
at the 2023 municipal election shall:
(1) be elected at the 2028 general election; and
(2) take office at noon on January 1, 2029.
(c) The successors of an individual elected to a municipal office
under subsection (b) shall:
(1) be elected at the general election held in each presidential
election year;
(2) take office the following January 1 at noon; and
(3) serve a term of four (4) years.
Sec. 4. (a) An individual elected as a judge of a city or town
court at the 2023 municipal election is entitled to hold over after
the expiration of the individual's term until a successor has been
elected and qualified under subsection (b).
(b) The successor of an individual elected as a judge of a city or
town court at the 2023 municipal election shall:
(1) be elected at the 2028 general election; and
(2) take office at noon on January 1, 2029.
(c) The successors of an individual elected as a judge of a city or
town court under subsection (b) shall:
(1) be elected at the general election held in each presidential
election year;
(2) take office the following January 1 at noon; and
(3) serve a term of four (4) years.
Sec. 5. Except as provided in section 6 of this chapter, the
successors of an individual elected to a municipal office at the 2022
general election shall:
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

48
(1) be elected at the general election held in each
nonpresidential election year;
(2) take office the following January 1 at noon; and
(3) serve a term of four (4) years.
Sec. 6. (a) This subsection applies to an individual elected to a
municipal office at the 2022 general election in a:
(1) town that has a population of more than ten thousand
(10,000) that has adopted a resolution under section 2(a) of
this chapter; or
(2) city that has not adopted a resolution under section 2(b) of
this chapter.
An individual described in this subsection is entitled to hold over
after the expiration of the individual's term until a successor has
been elected. The successor of an individual described in this
subsection shall be elected under IC 3-10-6 at the 2027 municipal
election.
(b) This subsection applies to an individual elected to a
municipal office at the 2023 municipal election in a:
(1) town that has a population of more than ten thousand
(10,000) that has adopted a resolution under section 2(a) of
this chapter; or
(2) city that has not adopted a resolution under section 2(b) of
this chapter.
The successor of an individual described in this subsection shall be
elected under IC 3-10-6 at the 2027 municipal election.
(c) Except as otherwise provided by law, the successors of an
individual elected under subsection (a) or (b) shall:
(1) be elected at the municipal election held in each
odd-numbered year before a presidential election year under
IC 3-10-6;
(2) take office the following January 1; and
(3) serve a term of four (4) years.
Sec. 7. The successors of an individual elected to a municipal
office at the 2024 general election shall:
(1) be elected at the general election held in each presidential
election year;
(2) take office the following January 1; and
(3) serve a term of four (4) years.
Sec. 8. (a) This section applies to each political party whose
nominee received at least ten percent (10%) of the votes cast for
secretary of state at the most recent election for secretary of state.
(b) The political party shall nominate all candidates for election
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

49
to municipal offices at a primary election as provided in this
article.
Sec. 9. (a) This section applies to a candidate of a political party:
(1) not qualified to conduct a primary election under this
article; and
(2) not required to nominate candidates by a petition of
nomination under IC 3-8-6.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 3-10-6-1, a candidate for election to a
municipal office must be nominated at a convention in the manner
described in IC 3-10-6-12.
Sec. 10. The general election for municipal offices shall be held
on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the
following:
(1) A presidential election year, for municipal offices whose
terms expire at the end of the presidential election year.
(2) A nonpresidential election year, for municipal offices
whose terms expire at the end of the nonpresidential election
year.
Sec. 11. (a) In accordance with IC 3-11-1.5 and to the extent
applicable and feasible, the circuit court clerk, the county fiscal
body, the county executive, and the county election board of each
county in which there are voters who are entitled to vote for offices
in a municipality, but who live in a county adjacent to the county
in which the greatest percentage of the population of the
municipality resides, shall:
(1) upon written request of their counterpart election officers
in the county with the greatest percentage of the population
of the municipality, establish precincts in the municipality;
and
(2) supply the precincts established with poll lists and perform
all other duties under this title as if the voters were
inhabitants of a municipality with the greatest percentage of
its population within that county.
(b) The commission shall, if necessary, implement this section by
orders and rules. Local governments may use IC 36-1-7 for
contractual agreements concerning the costs of services, supplies,
and equipment required.
SECTION 13. IC 3-10-6-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter
applies to municipal and school district elections in the following
municipalities:
(1) all cities and towns having a population of more than ten
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

50
thousand (10,000) to which IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply.
(2) Towns having a population of three thousand five hundred
(3,500) or more.
(3) Towns located entirely or partially within a county having a
consolidated city, regardless of their population.
(b) Prison inmates may not be counted in determining population
size for purposes of this chapter.".
Page 1, line 4, strike "applies" and insert "expires upon HEA
1055-2026 becoming effective.".
Page 1, line 4, strike "to".
Page 1, line 4, delete "all".
Page 1, line 4, strike "municipalities.".
Page 1, after line 9, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 14. IC 3-10-6.5-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "municipal election year"
refers to an odd-numbered year determined under IC 3-10-6-5.
SECTION 15. IC 3-10-6.5-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 3. During a year immediately before a municipal
election year, the legislative body of a municipality may adopt an
ordinance providing that each elected office of the municipality is
elected in an even-numbered year.
SECTION 16. IC 3-10-6.5-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 4. An ordinance described in section 3 of this chapter
must provide the following:
(1) The term of office for each individual elected to an office of
the municipality at the next municipal election year. A term of
office set under this subdivision must be either:
(A) one (1) year; or
(B) three (3) years;
as specified in the ordinance for each elected office of the
municipality.
(2) That the successors of the individuals elected during the next
municipal election year shall be elected in the following
applicable even-numbered year as determined by the term of
office set for each office in the ordinance under subdivision (1).
(3) That the term of office of the successors of the individuals
elected for the initial term of office set for each office under
subdivision (1) is four (4) years, beginning January 1 after their
respective elections.
SECTION 17. IC 3-10-6.5-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 5. If a municipality adopts an ordinance under section
3 of this chapter, the elected officers of the municipality shall be
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

51
elected under IC 3-10-6 or IC 3-10-7:
(1) whichever is applicable to the municipality; and
(2) to the extent either of those statutes is not inconsistent with
this chapter.
SECTION 18. IC 3-10-6.5-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 6. An ordinance adopted under this chapter:
(1) may not be repealed earlier than twelve (12) years after the
ordinance was adopted under section 3 of this chapter; and
(2) may be repealed only in a year preceding a municipal election
year.
SECTION 19. IC 3-10-6.5-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 7. An ordinance adopted under section 3 or 6 of this
chapter takes effect when the ordinance is filed with the circuit court
clerk of the county in which the largest percentage of the population of
the municipality is located.
SECTION 20. IC 3-10-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. (Municipal Elections in Small Towns Located Outside
Marion County).
SECTION 21. IC 3-10-12-3.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2017,
SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3.4. (a) This section applies to a voter who:
(1) changes residence from a precinct in a county to another
precinct:
(A) in the same county; and
(B) in the same congressional district;
as the former precinct; and
(2) does not notify the county voter registration office of the
change of address before election day.
(b) A voter described by subsection (a) may:
(1) correct the voter registration record; and
(2) vote in the precinct where the voter formerly resided;
if the voter makes an oral affirmation as described in subsection (e) or
uses the affidavit prescribed by the election division under
IC 3-10-11-6 to make a written affirmation of the voter's current
residence address as described in section 4 of this chapter. of the
voter's current residence address.
(c) A voter who moved outside of a municipality may not return to
the precinct where the voter formerly resided to vote in a municipal an
election for municipal offices of that municipality.
(d) A voter who moved from a location outside a municipality to a
location within a municipality before a:
(1) municipal primary election for municipal offices;
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

52
(2) municipal general election for municipal offices; or
(3) special election held only within the municipality;
may not vote in the municipal primary election municipal for
municipal offices, general election for municipal offices, or special
election held only within the municipality in the precinct of the person's
former residence.
(e) A voter entitled to make a written affirmation under subsection
(b) may make an oral affirmation. The voter must make the oral
affirmation before the poll clerks of the precinct. After the voter makes
an oral affirmation under this subsection, the poll clerks shall:
(1) reduce the substance of the affirmation to writing at an
appropriate location on the poll list; and
(2) initial the affirmation.
SECTION 22. IC 3-11-1.5-25 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 25. (a) In a year
in which a general election is held, a precinct establishment order
may not become effective during the following periods:
(1) In a year in which a general election is held, the period
beginning on the first day that a declaration of candidacy may be
filed under IC 3-8-2-4 and ending the day following general
election day.
(2) (b) This subsection applies to a municipal election that is
held in a municipality to which IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply. For
precincts located wholly or partially within a municipality, a precinct
establishment order may not become effective after January 31 and
before the day following municipal election day, in a year in which a
municipal election is held.
SECTION 23. IC 3-11-1.5-33 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 33. (a) If the
boundaries of a municipality are extended before a municipal primary
election or a municipal an election:
(1) to nominate candidates for municipal offices; or
(2) to elect candidates for municipal offices;
and the territory within those boundaries has not been included in
precincts wholly within the municipality, the voters within the extended
boundaries may vote, if otherwise qualified, in the municipal primary
election or municipal the general election.
(b) The voters may vote in the precinct in which they have their
residence as if the precinct had been established to include them in a
precinct wholly within the municipality. These votes shall be counted
and included in the canvass of the votes cast in the municipal primary
election or municipal the general election.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

53
SECTION 24. IC 3-11-1.5-35, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2005,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 35. (a) This section applies to a county that
has a precinct that crosses a boundary in violation of section 4(4), 4(5),
or 4(6) of this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding section 25 of this chapter, if the county does
not issue a precinct establishment order that establishes precincts in
compliance with section 4(4), 4(5), and 4(6) of this chapter by the
January 31 following the last effective date described in section 25(2)
25(b) of this chapter, the commission may issue an order establishing
precincts as provided under subsection (c).
(c) An order issued by the commission under this section must
comply with section 4(4), 4(5), and 4(6) of this chapter.
(d) The co-directors shall send a copy of the commission's order to
the office.
SECTION 25. IC 3-11-10-26.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2021,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 26.5. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a municipal election conducted in a municipality to which
IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply;
(2) a primary conducted in a municipal election year in a
municipality to which IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply; and
(3) a special election conducted under IC 3-10-8 and that is not
conducted at the same time as any other election.
(b) Notwithstanding section 26 of this chapter or IC 3-11-18.1-4 in
a vote center county, a county election board (or a town election board
acting under IC 3-10-7) may adopt a resolution or an amendment to a
county vote center plan by the unanimous vote of the board's entire
membership stating that voters are entitled to vote by absentee ballot
before an absentee voter board in the office of the circuit court clerk or
town election board during specific days and hours identified in the
resolution.
(c) If the election board adopts a resolution or an amendment under
subsection (b), the board must include written findings of fact in the
resolution or amendment stating:
(1) the number of absentee ballot applications anticipated or
previously received for the election;
(2) the expense to be incurred by providing absentee ballot voting
in the office during the entire period required under section 26 of
this chapter; and
(3) that voters would experience little or no inconvenience by
restricting absentee ballot voting in the office to the days and
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

54
hours specified in the resolution or amendment.
SECTION 26. IC 3-11-18.1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2023,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b),
and (c), a plan must provide a vote center for use by voters residing
within the county for use in a primary election, general election, special
election, municipal primary, or municipal election conducted on or
after the effective date of the county election board's order.
(b) A plan may provide that a vote center will not be used in a
municipal election conducted in 2023, 2027, 2031, 2035, 2039, 2043,
and every four (4) years thereafter for some or all of the towns:
(1) located within the county; and
(2) having a population of less than three thousand five hundred
(3,500).
(c) This section does not apply in a town that has established a town
election board under IC 3-10-7-5.7 while the resolution established
under IC 3-10-7-5.7 is in effect.
SECTION 27. IC 3-12-5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) Whenever a
candidate is elected:
(1) to a local or school board office other than
(A) one for which a town clerk-treasurer issues a certificate of
election under IC 3-10-7-34; or
(B) one commissioned by the governor under IC 4-3-1-5; or
(2) a precinct committeeman or state convention delegate;
the circuit court clerk shall, when permitted under section 16 of this
chapter, prepare and deliver to the candidate on demand a certificate
of the candidate's election.
(b) This subsection applies to a local or school board office
described in subsection (a) with an election district located in more
than one (1) county and a local public question placed on the ballot in
more than one (1) county. The circuit court clerk of the county that
contains the greatest percentage of the population of the election
district shall, upon demand of the candidate or a person entitled to
request a recount of the votes cast on a public question under
IC 3-12-12:
(1) obtain the certified statement of the votes cast for that office
or on that question that was prepared under IC 3-12-4-9 from the
circuit court clerk in each other county in which the election
district is located;
(2) tabulate the total votes cast for that office or on that question
as shown on the certified statement of each county in the election
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

55
district; and
(3) issue a certificate of election to the candidate when permitted
under section 16 of this chapter or a certificate declaring the local
public question approved or rejected.
SECTION 28. IC 3-12-6-31 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 31. (a) The circuit
court clerk shall transmit the certificate prepared under section 30 of
this chapter to the election division, the county election board or other
public official authorized by this title to issue:
(1) a certificate of nomination under IC 3-8-7;
(2) a certificate of election under IC 3-10-7-34 or IC 3-12-5-2; or
(3) a commission for the office under IC 4-3-1-5.
(b) The election division shall provide a copy of a certificate
transmitted to the election division under this section to the office.
SECTION 29. IC 3-12-11-25, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 25. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
whenever the commission makes a final determination under section
18 of this chapter that the candidate who is subject to a contest
proceeding is not eligible to serve in the office to which the candidate
is nominated or elected, the candidate who received the second highest
number of votes for the office is entitled to a certificate of nomination
or certificate of election even though a certificate may have been issued
to another candidate upon the tabulation of the votes.
(b) This subsection applies to a contest proceeding for a state office
other than the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, and judge of the tax court.
Whenever the commission makes a final determination under section
18(b) of this chapter that the candidate who is subject to a contest
proceeding is not eligible to serve in the office to which the candidate
is elected the following apply:
(1) This subdivision does not apply to the filling of a state office
following a contest proceeding or court action that resulted from
an election held before January 1, 2011. The office is considered
vacant, and the governor shall fill the vacancy as provided in
IC 3-13-4-3(e) by the appointment of a person of the same
political party as the candidate who is not eligible to serve.
(2) The commission's determination that the candidate is not
eligible to serve in the office does not affect the votes cast for the
candidate for purposes of determining the number or percentage
of votes cast for purposes of other statutes, including
IC 3-5-2.1-62, IC 3-6-2-1, IC 3-6-4.1-6, IC 3-6-5.2-7, IC 3-6-6-8,
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

56
IC 3-6-7-1, IC 3-6-8-1, IC 3-8-4, IC 3-8-6, IC 3-10-1-2,
IC 3-10-2-15, IC 3-10-4-2, IC 3-10-6, IC 3-10-7-26, IC 3-11-2-6,
IC 3-11-13-11, IC 3-11-14-3.5, IC 3-13-9-4.5, IC 6-9-2-3, and
IC 36-4-1.5-2.
SECTION 30. IC 3-13-8-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.119-2005,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) This section applies to a vacancy in the
city-county council of a first class city not covered by section 1 of this
chapter.
(b) A vacancy shall be filled by a majority of the remaining
members of the council at a regular or special meeting. The city clerk
shall give notice of the meeting. Except as provided in subsection (c),
the meeting shall be held not later than thirty (30) days after the
vacancy occurs. The notice must:
(1) be in writing;
(2) state the purpose of the meeting;
(3) state the date, time, and place of the meeting; and
(4) be sent by first class mail to each council member at least ten
(10) days before the meeting.
(c) If a vacancy exists because of the death of a council member, the
council shall meet and select an individual to fill the vacancy not later
than thirty (30) days after the city clerk receives notice of the death
under IC 5-8-6. The city clerk may not give the notice required by
subsection (b) until the city clerk receives notice of the death under
IC 5-8-6.
(d) The appointed member serves until a successor is elected and
qualified at the next municipal or general election whichever occurs
first. for members of the city-county council. The successor serves
from noon January 1 following that election to noon January 1
following the next municipal election for members of the city-county
council, as provided in IC 36-3-4-2. The persons appointed and elected
must be resident voters in the district where the vacancy occurred,
unless the vacancy occurred in an at large seat.
SECTION 31. IC 5-4-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.55-2022,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) The oath required by section 1 of this
chapter, except in the case of a notary public or in those cases specified
in section 3 of this chapter, shall be endorsed on or attached to the:
(1) commission;
(2) certificate if a certificate was issued under IC 3-10-7-34,
IC 3-12-4 or IC 3-12-5; or
(3) certificate of appointment pro tempore under IC 3-13-11-11;
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

57
signed by the person taking the oath, and certified to by the officer
before whom the oath was taken, who shall also deliver to the person
taking the oath a copy of the oath.
(b) A copy of the oath of office of a prosecuting attorney shall be
attached to the commission of the prosecuting attorney.
SECTION 32. IC 33-35-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2023,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) During 2026, 2030, 2034, 2038, 2042,
and every fourth year after that, a second or third class city or a town
may by ordinance establish or abolish a city or town court. An
ordinance to establish a city or town court must be adopted not less
than one (1) year before the judge's term would begin under
IC 3-10-5.5-4 or section 3 of this chapter.
(b) The judge for a court established under subsection (a) shall be
elected under one (1) of the following, as applicable to the
municipality:
(1) IC 3-10-6, or IC 3-10-7, at the municipal election in
November 2023, 2027, 2031, 2035, 2039, 2043, and every four
(4) years thereafter.
(2) IC 3-10-5.5.
(c) A court established under subsection (a) comes into existence on
January 1 of the year following the year in which a judge is elected to
serve in that court.
(d) A city or town court in existence on January 1, 1986, may
continue in operation until it is abolished by ordinance.
(e) A city or town that establishes or abolishes a court under this
section shall give notice of its action to the following:
(1) The office of judicial administration under IC 33-24-6.
(2) The secretary of state.
(3) The circuit court clerk of the county in which the greatest
population of the city or town resides.
SECTION 33. IC 33-35-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2015,
SECTION 48, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) The judge of a city or town court shall
be elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 or IC 3-10-7 by the voters
of the city or town.
(b) Except as provided in subsections subsection (c), (d), and (e),
the term of office of a judge elected under this section is four (4) years,
beginning at noon January 1 after election and continuing until a
successor is elected and qualified.
(c) This subsection applies to a town that adopts an ordinance under
IC 3-10-6-2.6. The term of office of:
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

58
(1) a judge elected at the next municipal election not conducted
in a general election year is one (1) year; and
(2) the successors to the judge described in subdivision (1) is four
(4) years;
beginning at noon January 1 after election and continuing until a
successor is elected and qualified.
(d) This subsection applies to a town that adopts an ordinance under
IC 3-10-7-2.7. The term of office of:
(1) a judge elected at the next municipal election not conducted
in a general election year is three (3) years; and
(2) the successors to the judge described in subdivision (1) is four
(4) years;
beginning noon January 1 after election and continuing until a
successor is elected and qualified.
(e) This subsection applies to a town that adopts an ordinance under
IC 3-10-7-2.9. The term of office of:
(1) a judge elected in the first election cycle after adoption of the
ordinance is the term of office provided by the ordinance, not to
exceed four (4) years; and
(2) the successors of the judge described in subdivision (1) is four
(4) years.
(f) (d) Before beginning the duties of office, the judge shall, in the
manner prescribed by IC 5-4-1, execute a bond conditioned upon the
faithful discharge of the duties of office.
SECTION 34. IC 33-35-3-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) The officers
of a city court are a:
(1) judge;
(2) clerk; and
(3) bailiff.
However, in third class cities, the judge may act as clerk and perform
all duties of the clerk of the court or appoint a clerk of the court. If the
judge does not act as clerk of the court or appoint a clerk of the court,
the city clerk-treasurer elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 shall
perform the duties of the clerk of the city court.
(b) The clerk is an officer of a town court. The judge of a town court
may act as clerk and perform all duties of the clerk of the court or
appoint a clerk of the court. If the judge does not act as a clerk of the
court or appoint a clerk of the court, the town clerk-treasurer elected
under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 or IC 3-10-7 shall perform the duties
of the clerk of the town court.
(c) The clerk and bailiff may not receive any fees or compensation
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

59
other than their salaries.
SECTION 35. IC 36-1-2-11.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.5. "Nonpresidential
election year" has the meaning set forth in IC 3-5-2.1-68.5.
SECTION 36. IC 36-1-2-13.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 13.5. "Presidential election
year" has the meaning set forth in IC 3-5-2.1-82.8.
SECTION 37. IC 36-1.5-4-35, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2006,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 35. (a) This section applies to an initial
election:
(1) of the members of a governing body or officers that are
elected by the voters for a reorganized political subdivision that:
(A) is a town; and
(B) has town boundaries that encompass part of another town
that was part of the reorganization;
(2) that is conducted before the reorganization takes effect; and
(3) to which IC 3-10-7-1 IC 3-10-5.5 applies.
(b) The members of each precinct board shall be jointly appointed
by the town election boards of each of the reorganizing political
subdivisions.
SECTION 38. IC 36-1.5-4-36, AS AMENDED BY P.L.113-2010,
SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 36. (a) This section applies if
section 5 of this chapter requires an election for a reorganization to
become effective.
(b) At the next:
(1) general election, if:
(A) the reorganized political subdivision is not a municipality
or a school corporation; or
(B) the reorganized political subdivision results from a
reorganization including a county and at least one (1)
municipality; or
(C) the reorganized political subdivision is a municipality
to which IC 3-10-5.5 applies;
(2) municipal election, if the reorganized political subdivision is
a municipality to which IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply; or
(3) primary or general election, as specified in an election plan
adopted in substantially identical resolutions by the legislative
body of each of the participating political subdivisions if the
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

60
reorganized political subdivision is a school corporation;
after the voters approve a reorganization, one (1) set of officers for the
reorganized political subdivision having the combined population of
the reorganizing political subdivisions shall be elected by the voters in
the territory of the reorganized political subdivision as prescribed by
statute.
(c) In the election described in subsection (b):
(1) one (1) member of the legislative body of the reorganized
political subdivision shall be elected from each election district
established by the reorganizing political subdivisions in
substantially identical resolutions adopted by the legislative body
of each of the reorganizing political subdivisions; and
(2) the total number of at large members shall be elected as
prescribed by statute for the reorganized political subdivision.
(d) If appointed officers are required in the reorganized political
subdivision, one (1) set of appointed officers shall be appointed for the
reorganized political subdivision. The appointments shall be made as
required by statute for the reorganized political subdivision. Any
statute requiring an appointed officer to reside in the political
subdivision where the appointed officer resides shall be treated as
permitting the appointed officer to reside in any part of the territory of
the reorganized political subdivision.
SECTION 39. IC 36-3-3-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A mayor,
who is the executive of both the consolidated city and the county, shall
be elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6, whichever is applicable to
the consolidated city, by the voters of the whole county.
(b) To be eligible to serve as the executive, a person must meet the
qualifications prescribed by IC 3-8-1-24.
(c) The term of office of an executive is four (4) years, beginning at
noon on January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is
elected and qualified.
SECTION 40. IC 36-3-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.193-2021,
SECTION 109, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A city-county council,
which is the legislative body of both the consolidated city and the
county, shall be elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6, whichever is
applicable to the consolidated city, by the voters of the county. The
city-county council consists of twenty-five (25) members.
(b) To be eligible to serve as a member of the legislative body, a
person must meet the qualifications prescribed by IC 3-8-1-25.
(c) A member of the legislative body must reside within:
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

61
(1) the county as provided in Article 6, Section 6 of the
Constitution of the State of Indiana; and
(2) the district from which the member was elected.
(d) A vacancy in the legislative body occurs whenever a member:
(1) dies, resigns, or is removed from office;
(2) ceases to be a resident of the district from which the member
was elected; or
(3) is incapacitated to the extent that the member is unable to
perform the member's duties for more than six (6) months.
(e) The vacancy shall be filled under IC 3-13-8.
(f) The term of office of a member of the legislative body is four (4)
years, beginning at noon on January 1 after election and continuing
until a successor is elected and qualified.
SECTION 41. IC 36-4-1-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) Whenever
the classification of a city under section 1 of this chapter changes due
to a change in the city's population, the city shall be governed by the
laws applicable to its new class, except as provided by subsection (b).
(b) The membership of a city legislative body remains unchanged
until the expiration of the terms of its members, despite a change in the
classification of the city for any reason. At the:
(1) municipal election, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the city;
or
(2) general election, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the city;
preceding the expiration of those terms, the number of members of the
legislative body required by the laws applicable to its new class shall
be elected. The powers, duties, functions, and office of an elected
official of a city shall remain unchanged until the expiration of the term
of the elected official, despite a change in city classification for any
reason.
SECTION 42. IC 36-4-1.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.202-2013,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) A town legislative body may satisfy the
requirements of this section in an ordinance adopted either before or
after the town's voters vote on the question described in section 2 of
this chapter.
(b) If a resolution is adopted under section 2 of this chapter, the
town legislative body shall adopt an ordinance providing for the
transition from governance as a town to governance as a city. The
ordinance adopted under this section must include the following
details:
(1) A division of the town into city legislative body districts as
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

62
provided in the applicable provisions of IC 36-4-6.
(2) Provisions for the election of the following officers:
(A) The city executive.
(B) The members of the city legislative body.
(C) The city clerk or city clerk-treasurer as appropriate under
IC 36-4-10.
(3) The date of the first election of the city officers. The first
election may be held only on the date of the next general election
or municipal election whichever is earlier, at which officers are
elected in the municipality under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6,
following the date fixed for an election under section 2 of this
chapter on the question of whether the town should be changed
into a city. Candidates for election to the city offices shall be
nominated:
(A) at the corresponding primary election during a general
election year or a municipal election year; or
(B) as otherwise provided in IC 3.
(4) Subject to section 4 of this chapter, the term of office of each
city officer elected at the first election of city officers.
(5) Any other details the town legislative body considers useful in
providing for the transition of the town into a city.
(c) An ordinance adopted under this section is effective only if the
voters of the town approve the conversion of the town into a city under
section 2(6) of this chapter.
(d) The provisions of an ordinance adopted under this section are
subject to all other laws governing the structure of city government.
(e) Subject to this chapter, the town legislative body or the city
legislative body (after the town is changed into a city) may amend an
ordinance adopted under this section.
SECTION 43. IC 36-4-1.5-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.111-2005,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the term
of office of the city officers elected at the first election of city officers
held under the ordinance adopted under section 3 of this chapter:
(1) begins on January 1 after the first election of city officers; and
(2) may not extend after December 31 of the next:
(A) municipal election year that occurs after the first election
of city officers, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the city; or
(B) general election year that occurs after the first election
of city officers, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the city.
(b) The ordinance adopted under section 3 of this chapter may
provide for a shorter term of office for specified members of the city
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

63
legislative body to stagger terms as permitted under IC 3 and IC 36-4-6.
However, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the city, the ordinance
may provide for a shorter term of office under this subsection only
if a general election will occur in an even-numbered year before the
next municipal election occurring in the odd-numbered year before
a presidential election year, after the first election of city officers.
(c) After the first municipal election after the first election of city
officers, the term of office of each city officer is four (4) years.
SECTION 44. IC 36-4-2-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. An election held
under section 2 or 3 of this chapter may not be held in a calendar year
in which a general municipal election is to be held in the
odd-numbered year before a presidential election year.
SECTION 45. IC 36-4-2-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10. (a) At the next
general municipal election After a vote in favor of a merger at an
election held under section 2 or 3 of this chapter, one (1) set of officers
for a municipality having the combined population of the merging
municipalities shall be elected by the voters of the merging
municipalities as prescribed by statute, except that:
(1) one (1) member of the municipal legislative body shall be
elected from each district established under section 12 of this
chapter; and
(2) the total number of at large members prescribed by statute for
the municipal legislative body shall be elected.
(b) An election under subsection (a) must be held at the next:
(1) municipal election occurring in the odd-numbered year
before a presidential election year, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not
apply to each of the merging municipalities; or
(2) general election, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to one (1) or more
of the merging municipalities.
SECTION 46. IC 36-4-2-12 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 12. (a) The
legislative bodies of municipalities that vote to merge under this
chapter shall meet in joint session at the hall of the municipality having
the largest population at 8 p.m. on the second Monday of January of the
next year in which a:
(1) general municipal election is to be held, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies
to one (1) or more of the merging municipalities; or
(2) municipal election is to be held in the odd-numbered year
before a presidential election year, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not
apply to each of the merging municipalities.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

64
(b) At the joint meeting, the legislative bodies shall:
(1) elect a presiding officer and clerk; and
(2) fix, by joint resolution, the boundaries of the districts from
which members will be elected to the legislative body of the new
municipality.
The legislative bodies shall fix the district boundaries so that, as nearly
as is possible, all parts of the merging municipalities have equal
representation in the legislative body of the new municipality. The
district boundaries fixed under this subsection constitute the district
boundaries for the new municipality until they are altered by the
legislative body of the new municipality.
(b) (c) If any territory in the municipality is not included in one (1)
of the districts established under subsection (a), (b), the territory is
included in the district that:
(1) is contiguous to that territory; and
(2) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
territory.
(c) (d) If any territory in the municipality is included in more than
one (1) of the districts established under subsection (a), (b), the
territory is included in the district that:
(1) is one (1) of the districts in which the territory is described in
the joint resolution adopted under subsection (a); (b);
(2) is contiguous to that territory; and
(3) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
territory.
(d) (e) A copy of the joint resolution passed under subsection (a) (b)
shall be:
(1) certified by the presiding officer;
(2) attested by the clerk; and
(3) filed with the legislative body of each of the merging
municipalities and the circuit court clerk of each county in which
the municipalities are located.
SECTION 47. IC 36-4-5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A mayor,
who is the city executive, shall be elected under:
(1) IC 3-10-5.5; or
(2) IC 3-10-6;
as applicable to the city, by the voters of each city.
(b) A person is eligible to be a city executive only if the person
meets the qualifications prescribed by IC 3-8-1-26.
(c) Residency in territory that is annexed by the city before the
election is considered residency for the purposes of subsection (b),
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

65
even if the annexation takes effect less than one (1) year before the
election.
(d) The city executive must reside within the city as provided in
Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of Indiana. The
executive forfeits office if the executive ceases to be a resident of the
city.
(e) The term of office of a city executive is four (4) years, beginning
at noon on January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is
elected and qualified.
SECTION 48. IC 36-4-6-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A common
council, which is the city legislative body, shall be elected under:
(1) IC 3-10-5.5; or
(2) IC 3-10-6;
as applicable to the city, by the voters of each city.
(b) A person is eligible to be a member of the legislative body only
if the person meets the qualifications prescribed by IC 3-8-1-27.
(c) Residency in territory that is annexed by the city before the
person files a declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination is
considered residency for the purposes of subsection (b), even if the
annexation takes effect less than one (1) year before the election.
(d) A member of the legislative body must reside within:
(1) the city as provided in Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution
of the State of Indiana; and
(2) the district from which the member was elected, if applicable.
(e) A member forfeits office if the member ceases to be a resident
of the district or city.
(f) The term of office of a member of the legislative body is four (4)
years, beginning at noon on January 1 after election and continuing
until a successor is elected and qualified.
SECTION 49. IC 36-4-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2022,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) This section applies only to second class
cities.
(b) The legislative body shall adopt an ordinance to divide the city
into six (6) districts that:
(1) are composed of contiguous territory, except for territory that
is not contiguous to any other part of the city;
(2) are reasonably compact;
(3) do not cross precinct boundary lines, except as provided in
subsection (c) or (d); and
(4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

66
(c) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
precinct boundary line if:
(1) more than one (1) member of the legislative body elected from
the districts established under subsection (b) resides in one (1)
precinct established under IC 3-11-1.5 after the most recent
municipal election for members of the city legislative body; and
(2) following the establishment of a legislative body district
whose boundary crosses a precinct boundary line, not more than
one (1) member of the legislative body elected from districts
resides within the same city legislative body district.
(d) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
precinct line if the districts would not otherwise contain, as nearly as
is possible, equal population.
(e) A city legislative body district with a boundary described by
subsection (c) or (d) may not cross a census block boundary line:
(1) except when following a precinct boundary line; or
(2) unless the city legislative body certifies in the ordinance that
the census block has no population, and is not likely to ever have
population.
(f) The legislative body may not adopt an ordinance dividing the city
into districts with boundaries described by subsection (c) or (d) unless
the clerk of the city mails a written notice to the circuit court clerk. The
notice must:
(1) state that the legislative body is considering the adoption of an
ordinance described by this subsection; and
(2) be mailed not later than ten (10) days before the legislative
body adopts the ordinance.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (j), the division under
subsection (b) shall be made only at times permitted under IC 3-5-10.
(h) The legislative body is composed of six (6) members elected
from the districts established under subsection (b) and three (3) at-large
members.
(i) Each voter of the city may vote for three (3) candidates for
at-large membership and one (1) candidate from the district in which
the voter resides. The three (3) at-large candidates receiving the most
votes from the whole city and the district candidates receiving the most
votes from their respective districts are elected to the legislative body.
(j) If the legislative body determines that a division under subsection
(g) is not required, the legislative body shall adopt an ordinance
recertifying that the districts as drawn comply with this section.
(k) A copy of the ordinance establishing districts or a recertification
adopted under this section must be filed with the circuit court clerk of
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

67
the county that contains the greatest population of the city not later than
thirty (30) days after the ordinance or recertification is adopted. The
filing must include a map of the district boundaries:
(1) adopted under subsection (b); or
(2) recertified under subsection (j).
(l) The limitations set forth in this section are part of the ordinance,
but do not have to be specifically set forth in the ordinance. The
ordinance must be construed, if possible, to comply with this chapter.
If a provision of the ordinance or an application of the ordinance
violates this chapter, the invalidity does not affect the other provisions
or applications of the ordinance that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application. The provisions of the ordinance are
severable.
(m) IC 3-5-10 applies to a plan established under this section.
SECTION 50. IC 36-4-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2022,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) This section applies to third class cities,
except as provided by section 5 of this chapter.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
described by subsection (j) or (m). The legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance to divide the city into five (5) districts that:
(1) are composed of contiguous territory, except for territory that
is not contiguous to any other part of the city;
(2) are reasonably compact;
(3) do not cross precinct boundary lines except as provided in
subsection (c) or (d); and
(4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
(c) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
precinct boundary line if:
(1) more than one (1) member of the legislative body elected from
the districts established under subsection (b), (j), or (m) resides in
one (1) precinct established under IC 3-11-1.5 after the most
recent municipal election for members of the city legislative
body; and
(2) following the establishment of a legislative body district
whose boundary crosses a precinct boundary line, not more than
one (1) member of the legislative body elected from the districts
resides within the same city legislative body district.
(d) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
precinct line if the districts would not otherwise contain, as nearly as
is possible, equal population.
(e) A city legislative body district with a boundary described by
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

68
subsection (c) or (d) may not cross a census block boundary line:
(1) except when following a precinct boundary line; or
(2) unless the city legislative body certifies in the ordinance that
the census block has no population, and is not likely to ever have
population.
(f) The legislative body may not adopt an ordinance dividing the city
into districts with boundaries described by subsection (c) or (d) unless
the clerk of the city mails a written notice to the circuit court clerk. The
notice must:
(1) state that the legislative body is considering the adoption of an
ordinance described by this subsection; and
(2) be mailed not later than ten (10) days before the legislative
body adopts the ordinance.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (o), the division under
subsection (b), (j), or (m) shall be made only at times permitted under
IC 3-5-10.
(h) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
described by subsection (j) or (m). The legislative body is composed of
five (5) members elected from the districts established under
subsection (b) and two (2) at-large members.
(i) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
described by subsection (j) or (m). Each voter of the city may vote for
two (2) candidates for at-large membership and one (1) candidate from
the district in which the voter resides. The two (2) at-large candidates
receiving the most votes from the whole city and the district candidates
receiving the most votes from their respective districts are elected to
the legislative body.
(j) A city may adopt an ordinance under this subsection to divide the
city into four (4) districts that:
(1) are composed of contiguous territory;
(2) are reasonably compact;
(3) do not cross precinct boundary lines, except as provided in
subsection (c) or (d); and
(4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
(k) This subsection applies to a city with an ordinance described by
subsection (j). The legislative body is composed of four (4) members
elected from the districts established under subsection (j) and three (3)
at-large members.
(l) This subsection applies to a city with an ordinance described by
subsection (j). Each voter of the city may vote for three (3) candidates
for at-large membership and one (1) candidate from the district in
which the voter resides. The three (3) at-large candidates receiving the
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

69
most votes from the whole city and the district candidates receiving the
most votes from their respective districts are elected to the legislative
body.
(m) This subsection applies only if the ordinance adopted under
IC 36-4-1.5-3 by the town legislative body of a town that has a
population of less than ten thousand (10,000) and that becomes a city
specifies that the city legislative body districts are governed by this
subsection. The ordinance adopted under IC 36-4-1.5-3(b)(1) dividing
the town into city legislative body districts may provide that:
(1) the city shall be divided into three (3) districts that:
(A) are composed of contiguous territory;
(B) are reasonably compact;
(C) do not cross precinct boundary lines, except as provided in
subsection (c) or (d); and
(D) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population; and
(2) the legislative body of the city is composed of three (3)
members elected from the districts established under this
subsection and two (2) at-large members.
Each voter of the city may vote for two (2) candidates for at-large
membership and one (1) candidate from the district in which the voter
resides. The two (2) at-large candidates receiving the most votes from
the whole city and the district candidates receiving the most votes from
their respective districts are elected to the legislative body.
(n) A copy of the ordinance establishing districts or a recertification
adopted under this section must be filed with the circuit court clerk of
the county that contains the greatest population of the city no not later
than thirty (30) days after the ordinance or recertification is adopted.
The filing must include a map of the district boundaries:
(1) adopted under subsection (b), (j), or (m); or
(2) recertified under subsection (o).
(o) If the legislative body determines that a division under
subsection (g) is not required, the legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance recertifying that the districts as drawn comply with this
section.
(p) The limitations set forth in this section are part of the ordinance,
but do not have to be specifically set forth in the ordinance. The
ordinance must be construed, if possible, to comply with this chapter.
If a provision of the ordinance or an application of the ordinance
violates this chapter, the invalidity does not affect the other provisions
or applications of the ordinance that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application. The provisions of the ordinance are
severable.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

70
(q) IC 3-5-10 applies to a plan established under this section.
SECTION 51. IC 36-4-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2022,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) This section applies to third class cities
having a population of less than ten thousand (10,000). The legislative
body of such a city may, by ordinance adopted after June 30, 2010, and
during a year in which an election of the legislative body will not
occur, decide to be governed by this section instead of section 4 of this
chapter. The legislative body districts created by an ordinance adopted
under this subsection apply to the first election of the legislative body
held after the date the ordinance is adopted. The clerk of the legislative
body shall send a certified copy of any ordinance adopted under this
subsection to the secretary of the county election board.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
described by subsection (j). The legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance to divide the city into four (4) districts that:
(1) are composed of contiguous territory, except for territory that
is not contiguous to any other part of the city;
(2) are reasonably compact;
(3) do not cross precinct boundary lines except as provided in
subsection (c) or (d); and
(4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
(c) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
precinct boundary line if:
(1) more than one (1) member of the legislative body elected from
the districts established under subsection (b) or (j) resides in one
(1) precinct established under IC 3-11-1.5 after the most recent
municipal election for members of the city legislative body; and
(2) following the establishment of a legislative body district
whose boundary crosses a precinct boundary line, not more than
one (1) member of the legislative body elected from the districts
resides within the same city legislative body district.
(d) The boundary of a city legislative body district may cross a
precinct line if the districts would not otherwise contain, as nearly as
is possible, equal population.
(e) A city legislative body district with a boundary described by
subsection (c) or (d) may not cross a census block boundary line:
(1) except when following a precinct boundary line; or
(2) unless the city legislative body certifies in the ordinance that
the census block has no population, and is not likely to ever have
population.
(f) The legislative body may not adopt an ordinance dividing the city
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

71
into districts with boundaries described by subsection (c) or (d) unless
the clerk of the city mails a written notice to the circuit court clerk. The
notice must:
(1) state that the legislative body is considering the adoption of an
ordinance described by this subsection; and
(2) be mailed not later than ten (10) days before the legislative
body adopts the ordinance.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (o), the division under
subsection (b) or (j) shall be made only at times permitted under
IC 3-5-10.
(h) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
described by subsection (j). The legislative body is composed of four
(4) members elected from the districts established under subsection (b)
and one (1) at-large member.
(i) This subsection does not apply to a city with an ordinance
described by subsection (j). Each voter may vote for one (1) candidate
for at-large membership and one (1) candidate from the district in
which the voter resides. The at-large candidate receiving the most votes
from the whole city and the district candidates receiving the most votes
from their respective districts are elected to the legislative body.
(j) A city may adopt an ordinance under this subsection to divide the
city into three (3) districts that:
(1) are composed of contiguous territory, except for territory that
is not contiguous to any other part of the city;
(2) are reasonably compact;
(3) do not cross precinct boundary lines, except as provided in
subsection (c) or (d); and
(4) contain, as nearly as is possible, equal population.
(k) This subsection applies to a city with an ordinance described by
subsection (j). The legislative body is composed of three (3) members
elected from the districts established under subsection (j) and two (2)
at-large members.
(l) This subsection applies to a city with an ordinance described by
subsection (j). Each voter of the city may vote for two (2) candidates
for at-large membership and one (1) candidate from the district in
which the voter resides. The two (2) at-large candidates receiving the
most votes from the whole city and the district candidates receiving the
most votes from their respective districts are elected to the legislative
body.
(m) This subsection applies to a city having a population of less than
seven thousand (7,000). A legislative body of such a city that has, by
resolution adopted before May 7, 1991, decided to continue an election
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

72
process that permits each voter of the city to vote for one (1) candidate
at large and one (1) candidate from each of its four (4) council districts
may hold elections using that voting arrangement. The at-large
candidate and the candidate from each district receiving the most votes
from the whole city are elected to the legislative body. The districts
established in cities adopting such a resolution may cross precinct
boundary lines.
(n) A copy of the ordinance establishing districts or a recertification
under this section must be filed with the circuit court clerk of the
county that contains the greatest population of the city not later than
thirty (30) days after the ordinance or recertification is adopted. The
filing must include a map of the district boundaries:
(1) adopted under subsection (b) or (j); or
(2) recertified under subsection (o).
(o) If the legislative body determines that a division under
subsection (b) or (j) is not required, the legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance recertifying that the districts as drawn comply with this
section.
(p) The limitations set forth in this section are part of the ordinance,
but do not have to be specifically set forth in the ordinance. The
ordinance must be construed, if possible, to comply with this chapter.
If a provision of the ordinance or an application of the ordinance
violates this chapter, the invalidity does not affect the other provisions
or applications of the ordinance that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application. The provisions of the ordinance are
severable.
(q) IC 3-5-10 applies to a plan established under this section.
SECTION 52. IC 36-5-1-10.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2022,
SECTION 164, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10.1. (a) If a majority of the
voters voting on the public question under section 8 of this chapter vote
"yes", the county executive shall adopt an ordinance incorporating the
town.
(b) An ordinance adopted under subsection (a) must:
(1) either:
(A) provide that all members of the town legislative body are
to be elected at large (if the town would have a population of
less than three thousand five hundred (3,500); or
(B) divide the town into not less than at least three (3) nor and
not more than seven (7) districts; and
(2) direct the county election board to conduct an election in the
town on the date of the next general or municipal election to be
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

73
held in any precincts in the county.
An election conducted under this section must comply with IC 3
concerning town elections. If the date that an ordinance is adopted
under this section is not later than June 1 of a general or municipal
election year, the election must be conducted on the date of the next
general or municipal election held in any precincts in the county after
the election for which absentee balloting is being conducted. However,
a primary election may not be conducted before an election conducted
under this section, regardless of the population of the town.
(c) Districts established by an ordinance adopted under this section
must comply with IC 3-11-1.5.
(d) If any territory in the town is not included in one (1) of the
districts established under this section, the territory is included in the
district that:
(1) is contiguous to that territory; and
(2) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
territory.
(e) If any territory in the town is included in more than one (1) of the
districts established under this section, the territory is included in the
district that:
(1) is one (1) of the districts in which the territory is described in
the ordinance adopted under this section;
(2) is contiguous to that territory; and
(3) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
territory.
(f) An ordinance adopted under this section becomes effective when
filed with:
(1) the office of the secretary of state; and
(2) the circuit court clerk of each county in which the town is
located.
(g) Each county that contains a part of the proposed town must
adopt identical ordinances providing for the incorporation of the town.
SECTION 53. IC 36-5-1.1-10.6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2022,
SECTION 169, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10.6. (a) This section applies
to included towns.
(b) The dissolution of a town under this section may be instituted by
filing a petition with the county board of registration. The petition must
be signed by at least the number of the registered voters of the town
required to place a candidate on the ballot under IC 3-8-6-3. The
petition must be filed not later than June 1 of a year in which a general
or municipal election will be held.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

74
(c) If a petition meets the criteria set forth in subsection (b), the
county board of registration shall certify the public question to the
county election board under IC 3-10-9-3. The county election board
shall place the question of dissolution on the ballot provided for voters
in the included town at the first general or municipal election following
certification. The question shall be placed on the ballot in the form
prescribed by IC 3-10-9-4 and must state "Shall the town of ________
dissolve?".
(d) If the public question is approved by a majority of the voters
voting on the question, the county election board shall file a copy of the
certification prepared under IC 3-12-4-9 concerning the public question
described by this section with the following:
(1) The circuit court clerk of the county.
(2) The office of the secretary of state.
(e) Dissolution occurs:
(1) at least sixty (60) days after certification under IC 3-12-4-9;
and
(2) when the certification is filed under subsection (d).
(f) When a town is dissolved under this section:
(1) the territory included within the town when the ordinance was
adopted becomes a part of the consolidated city;
(2) the books and records of the town become the property of the
county executive;
(3) the property owned by the town after payment of debts and
liabilities shall be disposed of by the county executive; and
(4) the county executive shall deposit any proceeds remaining
after payment of debts and liabilities into the county general fund.
(g) The dissolution of a town under this section does not affect the
validity of a contract to which the town is a party.
SECTION 54. IC 36-5-2-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. The town
council elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 or IC 3-10-7 is the
town legislative body. The president of the town council selected under
section 7 of this chapter is the town executive.
SECTION 55. IC 36-5-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2015,
SECTION 60, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
(c), (d), or (e), (f), or (g), the term of office of a member of the
legislative body is four (4) years, beginning at noon January 1 after the
member's election and continuing until the member's successor is
elected and qualified.
(b) The term of office of a member of the legislative body appointed
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

75
to fill a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of town
legislative body members under section 4.2 of this chapter:
(1) begins when the ordinance increasing the number of
legislative body members takes effect, or when the member is
appointed under IC 3-13-9-4, if the appointment is made after the
ordinance takes effect; and
(2) continues until:
(A) noon January 1 following the next municipal election
scheduled under IC 3-10-6-5 or IC 3-10-7-6 for members of
the town legislative body; and until
(B) the member's successor is elected and qualified.
(c) The term of office of a member of the legislative body elected
under IC 36-5-1-10.1 following the incorporation of the town:
(1) begins at noon November 30 following the election; and
(2) continues until:
(A) noon January 1 following the next municipal election
scheduled under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6-5 or IC 3-10-7-6, as
applicable to the municipality; and until
(B) the member's successor is elected and qualified.
(d) The term of office of a member of the legislative body subject
to IC 3-10-6-2.5(d)(1) is three (3) years, beginning at noon January 1
after the member's election and continuing until the member's
successor is elected and qualified.
(e) The term of office of a member of a legislative body subject to
an ordinance described by IC 3-10-6-2.6 is one (1) year, beginning at
noon January 1 after the member's election and continuing until the
member's successor is elected and qualified.
(f) The term of office of a member of a legislative body subject to
an ordinance described by IC 3-10-7-2.7 is:
(1) three (3) years if the member is elected at the next municipal
election not conducted in a general election year; and
(2) four (4) years for the successors of a member of a legislative
body described in subdivision (1);
beginning noon January 1 after election and continuing until a
successor is elected and qualified.
(g) The term of office of a member of a legislative body subject to
an ordinance described by IC 3-10-7-2.9 is:
(1) the term of office provided by the ordinance, not to exceed
four (4) years, for a member of the legislative body elected in the
first election cycle after adoption of the ordinance; and
(2) four (4) years for the successors of the member of a legislative
body described in subdivision (1).
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

76
SECTION 56. IC 36-5-2-4.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2022,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.1. (a) The legislative body may, by
ordinance, divide the town into districts for the purpose of conducting
elections of town officers.
(b) A town legislative body district must comply with the following
standards:
(1) The district must be composed of contiguous territory, except
for territory that is not contiguous to any other part of the town.
(2) The district must be reasonably compact.
(3) The district must contain, as nearly as is possible, equal
population.
(4) The district may not cross a census block boundary except
when following a precinct boundary line or unless the ordinance
specifies that the census block has no population and is not likely
to have population before the effective date of the next federal
decennial census.
(5) The district may not cross precinct lines, except as provided
in subsection (c).
(c) The boundary of a town legislative body district established
under subsection (a) may cross a precinct boundary line if:
(1) the legislative body provides by ordinance under section 5 of
this chapter that all legislative body members are to be elected at
large by the voters of the whole town; or
(2) the district would not otherwise contain, as nearly as is
possible, equal population.
(d) If any territory in the town is not included in one (1) of the
districts established under this section, the territory is included in the
district that:
(1) is contiguous to that territory; and
(2) contains the least population of all districts contiguous to that
territory.
(e) The ordinance may be appealed in the manner prescribed by
IC 34-13-6. If the town is located in two (2) or more counties, the
appeal may be filed in the circuit or superior court of any of those
counties.
(f) This subsection does not apply to a town with an ordinance
described by subsection (g). Except as provided in subsection (j), the
division permitted by subsection (a) shall be made only at times
permitted under IC 3-5-10.
(g) This subsection applies to a town having a population of less
than three thousand five hundred (3,500). The town legislative body
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

77
may adopt an ordinance providing that:
(1) town legislative body districts are abolished; and
(2) all members of the legislative body are elected at large.
(h) An ordinance described by subsection (g):
(1) may not be adopted or repealed during a year in which a
municipal an election for municipal office is scheduled to be
conducted in the town under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6; or
IC 3-10-7; and
(2) is effective upon passage.
(i) A copy of the ordinance establishing districts or a recertification
under this section must be filed with the circuit court clerk of the
county that contains the greatest population of the town not later than
thirty (30) days after the ordinance or recertification is adopted. The
filing must include a map of the district boundaries:
(1) adopted under subsection (a); or
(2) recertified under subsection (j).
(j) If the legislative body determines that a division under subsection
(a) is not required, the legislative body shall adopt an ordinance
recertifying that the districts as drawn comply with this section.
(k) The limitations set forth in this section are part of the ordinance,
but do not have to be specifically set forth in the ordinance. The
ordinance must be construed, if possible, to comply with this chapter.
If a provision of the ordinance or an application of the ordinance
violates this chapter, the invalidity does not affect the other provisions
or applications of the ordinance that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application. The provisions of the ordinance are
severable.
(l) This subsection applies to a town having a population of less than
three thousand five hundred (3,500). If the town legislative body has
not:
(1) adopted an ordinance under subsection (a) and subject to
subsection (f) after December 31, 2011; or
(2) adopted an ordinance recertifying districts under subsection
(j) after December 31, 2011;
the town legislative body districts are abolished, effective January 1,
2018. A town described by this subsection may adopt an ordinance to
establish town legislative body districts in accordance with subsection
(a) and subject to subsection (f) after January 1, 2018.
(m) IC 3-5-10 applies to a plan established under this section.
SECTION 57. IC 36-5-2-4.2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.2. (a) This
section applies to the alteration of the number of members of a
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

78
legislative body.
(b) The legislative body may adopt a resolution to submit a public
question on the number of legislative body members to the voters of the
town. The resolution must state the following:
(1) The proposed number of legislative body members, which
must be at least three (3) and not more than seven (7).
(2) The date of the general municipal, or special election at which
the public question will appear on the ballot.
(3) That the following question will be placed on the ballot in the
form provided by IC 3-10-9-4:
"Shall the number of town council members be increased (or
decreased, if applicable) from ___________ (insert the current
number of members provided for) to _________ (insert the
number of members proposed in the resolution)?".
(c) IC 3 applies to an election conducted under subsection (b). If the
county election board will conduct the election at which the public
question will be submitted, the question must be certified to the board
under IC 3-10-9-3.
(d) If a majority of the votes cast on the question under subsection
(b) are in the negative, the legislative body may not adopt a resolution
under subsection (b) for at least one (1) year following the date the
prior resolution was adopted.
(e) If a majority of votes cast on the question under subsection (b)
are in the affirmative, the legislative body shall adopt an ordinance at
its next regular meeting following the election altering the number of
legislative body members to the number specified in the public
question. The legislative body may also alter existing districts and
establish new districts in the manner prescribed by IC 36-5-1-10.1. An
ordinance adopted under this subsection becomes effective January 1
following its adoption.
(f) If the number of legislative body members is increased, the
legislative body shall fill any resulting vacancy under IC 3-13-9-4. The
legislative body may fill the vacancy before the ordinance described in
subsection (e) takes effect. However, a town legislative body member
appointed under this subsection does not assume office until the
beginning of the term specified in section 3 of this chapter.
SECTION 58. IC 36-5-2-4.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.5. (a) This
section applies to a town if both of the following apply:
(1) The town has a population of more than ten thousand
(10,000).
(2) The town legislative body adopts an ordinance adopting the
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

79
provisions of this section. A town may not adopt an ordinance
under this section during a year in which municipal elections for
municipal offices are held in the town under IC 3-10-5.5 or
IC 3-10-6-5.
(b) A town legislative body has the following members:
(1) Five (5) members, each elected by the voters of a district. The
districts are established by ordinance by the town legislative body
as provided in this chapter.
(2) Two (2) members elected at large by all the voters of the town.
(c) An ordinance adopted under this section must provide for the
following:
(1) Four (4) members of the legislative body are elected during:
a
(A) the odd-numbered year that municipal elections are held
under IC 3-10-6-5. before a presidential election year, if
IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the town; or
(B) an even-numbered year, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the
town.
(2) Three (3) members of the legislative body are elected:
(A) if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the town, either:
(A) (i) during the year before the year described in
subdivision (1); (1)(A); or
(B) (ii) during the year after the year described in
subdivision (1). (1)(A); or
(B) if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the town, during the
even-numbered year after the year in which members are
elected under subdivision (1)(B).
The year for elections under this subdivision must be chosen so
that during the elections held for the town legislative body under
subdivision (4) or (5), a member of the town legislative body does
not serve a term of more than four (4) years.
(3) The members of the legislative body elected at large may not
be elected at the same time.
(4) If IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the town, at the first two (2)
elections after the ordinance is adopted, members are elected to
serve the following terms:
(A) Two (2) members elected under subdivision (1) (1)(A) are
elected to a four (4) year term and two (2) members elected
under subdivision (1) (1)(A) are elected to a three (3) year
term.
(B) Two (2) members elected under subdivision (2) (2)(A) are
elected to a four (4) year term and one (1) member elected
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

80
under subdivision (2) (2)(A) is elected to a three (3) year term.
The ordinance must provide a random procedure to determine
which members serve four (4) year terms and which members
serve three (3) year terms.
(5) If IC 3-10-5.5 applies to the town, at the first two (2)
elections after the ordinance is adopted, members are elected
to serve the following terms:
(A) Two (2) members elected under subdivision (1)(B) are
elected to a four (4) year term and two (2) members elected
under subdivision (1)(B) are elected to a two (2) year term.
(B) Two (2) members elected under subdivision (2)(B) are
elected to a four (4) year term and one (1) member elected
under subdivision (2)(B) is elected to a two (2) year term.
The ordinance must provide a random procedure to
determine which members serve four (4) year terms and
which members serve two (2) year terms.
(5) (6) A member of the town council elected after the elections
described in subdivision subdivisions (4) and (5) serves a term
of four (4) years.
(6) (7) The term of office of a member begins at noon January 1
after the member's election.
(d) An ordinance adopted under this section may provide that before
the first election after adoption of the ordinance, members of the town
legislative body added to the legislative body by the ordinance may be
appointed to the legislative body by a vote of the current members of
the legislative body.
(e) After the first two (2) elections held as described in subsection
(c)(4) and (c)(5), the town legislative body may adopt an ordinance to
do the following:
(1) Divide the town into seven (7) districts.
(2) Provide that the members elected at large are each elected
from a district.
An ordinance adopted under this subsection must comply with this
chapter in establishing the districts and provide details to provide a
transition from electing two (2) members at large to electing all
members from districts.
(f) Subject to this section, members of the town legislative body are
elected as provided in IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6-4.5, as applicable to
the town.
SECTION 59. IC 36-5-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2022,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) The clerk-treasurer must reside within
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

81
the town as provided in Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution of the
State of Indiana. The clerk-treasurer forfeits office if the clerk-treasurer
ceases to be a resident of the town. An individual who resides in
territory that is annexed by the town before the election is considered
a resident of the town for purposes of this subsection, even if the
annexation took effect less than one (1) year before the election.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), (d), (e), or (f), (c) or (d),
the term of office of the clerk-treasurer is four (4) years, beginning at
noon January 1 after election and continuing until a successor is elected
and qualified.
(c) The term of office of a clerk-treasurer elected under
IC 36-5-1-10.1 following the incorporation of the town:
(1) begins at noon November 30 following the election; and
(2) continues until noon January 1 following the next:
(A) municipal election scheduled under IC 3-10-6-5, or
IC 3-10-7-6, if IC 3-10-5.5 does not apply to the town; or
(B) general election that will occur at least three (3) years
after the clerk-treasurer's election, if IC 3-10-5.5 applies to
the town;
and until the clerk-treasurer's successor is elected and qualified.
(d) The term of office of a clerk-treasurer subject to an ordinance
described by IC 3-10-6-2.6 is:
(1) one (1) year if the clerk-treasurer is elected at the next
municipal election not conducted in a general election year; and
(2) four (4) years for the successors of the clerk-treasurer
described in subdivision (1);
beginning at noon January 1 after the clerk-treasurer's election and
continuing until the clerk-treasurer's successor is elected and qualified.
(e) The term of office of a clerk-treasurer subject to an ordinance
described by IC 3-10-7-2.7 is:
(1) three (3) years if the clerk-treasurer is elected at the next
municipal election not conducted in a general election year; and
(2) four (4) years for the successors of the clerk-treasurer
described in subdivision (1);
beginning noon January 1 after the clerk-treasurer's election and
continuing until the clerk-treasurer's successor is elected and qualified.
(f) The term of office of a clerk-treasurer subject to an ordinance
described by IC 3-10-7-2.9 is:
(1) the term of office provided by the ordinance, not to exceed
four (4) years, for the clerk-treasurer elected in the first election
cycle after adoption of the ordinance; and
(2) four (4) years for the successors of the clerk-treasurer
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144

82
described in subdivision (1).
SECTION 60. IC 36-5-6-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. The
clerk-treasurer shall be elected under IC 3-10-5.5 or IC 3-10-6 or
IC 3-10-7 by the voters of the whole town.
SECTION 61. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The legislative
services agency and the code revision committee shall prepare
legislation for introduction in the 2027 regular session of the
general assembly to make appropriate changes in statutes as
required by this act.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 62. An emergency is declared for this act.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1055 as printed January 14, 2026.)
GASKILL, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 6, Nays 3.
EH 1055—LS 6186/DI 144